      "identifier" : [
         "8_06911_455"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "XVIII. No. 11i M lE c ~~gu~ j q-n, iPrice 10 Cents JAN ADn 1A WAR MAKES STRANGE COMRADES' A British soldiler in Gallipoli shares his wvater-bottle with a wounded Turk, who la probably more of a »gentleman than hie German master. N À%ugust JL ý\u0026tng JL",
         "THE COURIER. El ectric Service Means comfort, conveni- ence, economy and safe- ty. The home that is pletely equipped electrical devices happy one. com- with is a Ail the clrudgery of house-keeping is elimmn- ated by ýelectricity. You can wash, iron, sew, sweep, cook, keep cool in summer and warm in winter, by means of electrical apparatus de- signed especiatly to, re- lieve you of unnecessary and fatiguing labor. At Our showroms ail these devices are\" ready for your inspection. Com- petent demonstrators wili operate and explain them for you. Thle Toronto E-1e ctriïc Light Company, Lixmted \"At Your Service\" 12 A\u003clelaide St. E. Telephone Miel. 404 W-'FOR YOUR NEXT BATCH 0F PRESERVES Buy good Frut irhich niust not Le over-ripe, andwhat is equallyimportant, use good Sugar. The slightest Impurity (organic matter) in the Suigar vill .,tart fermentation ln the jam, and preserves which vere veli cooked and carefully bottled, become acid and uneatabie after a f ew months. Yo* are absolidely safe wznth the ST, LAWRENCE EXTRA GRANULA TED SUCAR wlzich is made from Cane and tests ovsr 9.9.99 Per cent pure. Sgr If you prefer a very fine grain-a medium one or one quite large, your 9 grocer can suit your taatein St. L.awrence whlch is offered in the three grade\u0026 ln 2 lb. and 5 lb. Cartons, and bags of 10, 20. 25 and 100 Iba. Bu, in Refnery sealed packages to avoid muitake. and assure i'aoes beolute cleauline.. and correct weight. Sold by most good Grocers sir. LAwFREFNoE SuE3An RE:FINERIEcS\u003e, Limi-rED, MO\u003eNTRE:AL, r'4 I THE NEW U10 FLAT BOX AiAssoriwt of chIooe*~covd1~rnzNu,\u0026millAna. MtlChooltes Amonù~s and, MapleWnus I Agonquin Provincial (Ontario) Parl cY ' e X A Thoroughly Universal Vacation Territor,ý Midâtý WiId. and Delightful Scenery Ideal Canoe Trips-A Paradise for Camper\u0026 Splendid Fiahing 2,000 Feet Above Sea Level THE HIGHLAND INN' affords fine hotel accommodc, tion. Camps \" Nominigan\", and \" Minnesing \" ofik novel and comfortable accommodation at reasonabi rates. Write for illustrated matter giving full particulars, rates, etc to C. E. Horning, Union Station, Toronto, Ont.",
         "THE -COURIER. oo%0oo MILES FROM JELLICOE photograph taken sine the war began of the off !cers and men of H. M. S. Rainbow, stationed at Esquimait, B.C. Commander Hase ls seated In centre. The photograph was taken especially by Mr. C. H. Lugrin, of Victor'a, weiI-known as a wrlter ln both Eastern and Western Canada. VAR MAKES A NEW ENGLAND in Process of Social Evolution \u003eLE irbo think they belleve that Engla2ld dfore the irar mas a tired nation need te i reminded that the mother of nations Is 111 lu process of almost primitive evolution. lias net galvanized a meary people Into an )f unusual life te ble succeeded by national ian the war le over. Ât every great turu Ivents Englaud becomes a neir nation. The le le undergoing nom la only a phase cf the ation that 'began' irthin the memory of r'. And the difference (betmeen the Englaud Store the war and the England of the tiret Le 19th century during and atter the irars uleon is a greater transformation thanr can * l Garxnany or Russla or France or any ier nations at war. Elngland iras during the last ýgreat, con- rar lu whlch she iras the laadlng bellgerent Wou1d4be despot, le graphlcally piotimred by ir Mee, lu an article lu \"My Magazine.\" The e draws la oua of tramendous gleem, com- which the irorst picture of modem England Ini of optlmism and social evolutIcu. The Ys: 1k proudfly of hom England beat Napoleon By JAMES JO:HNSTO:N long ago, and how abhe will beat the Imitation Na- poleon irbo staiks across the Belgian wilderness. But hoir many cf us knOw howi England really beat Napoleon? A proud storY It is as we read'It ln the history books; as It unl read lu the Book cf Judg- ment there is nothing more terrible lu the story cf the humnan race. '\"Those who have read Mr. Thomas Hardy's great poema on 'The Dynasts'wmli rememyber the fear of the Engllsh inothers that ýthe ,Corsican Conqueror lived on human flaseh. It iras nlot llterally true, but It la morally- true that Napolecu -cousumed the Ilves of. countlise littie chIldren in these Islands. *lWe are not slow, 1 hope, to realize the amazlng ýeffort cf the people cf those -days, who poured out their money for freedom lu a way that surprises us even noir. But the time came wben the burden was toc grIcývous te be borne, and at last the employers complained that the high irages for men and rmen made it Impossible te pay the heavy taxes. \"Then it mas that those who should have knc'wn better, those irbo held ln their trust the future lite of this land, encouraged the manufacturers to use the chiidren. It seemed, an cld iriter said, as If thora faîl upon the manufacturers the terrible mords 7ýTake the chlldran. They seemed te tail upon Eng- land lke the voice cf Doem, and the masters listened te them. .They teck the children. They crammed \"the factories with machines so close that there iras juet room. for the little bodies to slip lu aud eut et the balte and wheels and spinning shatts.- They took themn at nine years old, they took them at six, they teck theru at tour; and they kept them lu the factories thirteen heursa day. Thay kept overseers te irhip them If, after tan heurs ot mark, their littie bodies became iirowsy' or slow; they kept black- smîthe te rivet and chain, them If thay tried te run amay. They made them, cean the machinery while .they ate their -poor meals of porridge made wlth mater; they made thema walk as much as thirty miles a day about their work; they klled aud maimad them lu thousaude; lu some factorisa eue child lu four mas crippled or injured, and few of the younger children lived more than three or four years atter entering the milîs. 14Dawn the ýmines, too, these littie chiidren went. Hom many et us have been Inte the bowels et the -earth? Parbaps we should lie atraid to go aven Ihe Mother of Nations is Stili",
         "TIRE COURIE*R. now, when most mines are healthy and safe. But these littie chlldreu stood flîteen hours without a stop lu the cold, dark mine, opening and sbutting trupdoors, or haruessed to heavy trucks, or standing lu black sime front five iu the moruing tili six at uight, pumping water at the bottom o! Vhe sba!t.\"1 PUBLIC INDIFFERENCE. T HE writer goes on Vo say that noue o! the great populur reformera seemed really to care about these terrible conditions euouýgh to change them. There was then uo voice o! labour that must be respected. In those days iV was not possible that a Lloyd George could go and ad*dress the minera, askiug them lu the name o! their country to go 'buck to work that the British might win the war througb Vhe abundaut supply o! coul. lu fact, Eugllsh labour iu those days was more under Vhe iron baud o! gov- ernment and ecouomlc usage than modern labour lu Germauy is under the bossîsm o! the war lords. Appurently Gladstone did not caris, .neither John Bright, wbo declared that the Ten Hour Bill was one o! Vhs worat mensures passed through Parliament, and proposed au ameudmeut that the bours o! labour should be !rom 5.30 ln Vhe moruing till 8.30 at ulgbt. \"Southey, IV ls true, wrote thut the slave trade was mercy compared wlth the child trade lu the fac- tories; but the* flrst intereat o! Parliament was aroused, not by ahame or sympathy or sorrow, but by fear. The chîldren were dylng so fast that there was no room lu the churchyards,, and, an Act was pussed limiting Vhs work o! childreu to twelve hours a day.\" ' AN ARISTOCRAT REFORMER. A COORDING to Mr. Mee, it was au aristocrat that re!ormed the conditions o! chuld labour lu Euglaud. Lord Shaftesùury was the man Who, lu bis day, did a work as greut as that o! Robert Raikes lu bis !oundation o! Suuday-schools, or Howard lu bis prison rs!orms, or John Wesley lu bis- evangehizationÎ work amoug the masses. This- man succesded lu a dernocratic rs!orm wbere the great tribunes o! Vhe people made littie or no effort. \"Lord Shaftesbury,\" writes Mr. Mes, \"ýwas more powsr!uh than John Bright. Parîlament rose te the mlghty beight o! !orbiddiug ulgbt work for childreu and llmltîng their Saturduy work te nins liours, and lu 1842 littie girls were savsd !rom the slavery o! the mine and only men o! ten years old were nllowed. Vo go down. In that year one-third of ail the workers lu our mines were childrsn; for evsry two men who wit dowu, oe chIld, weut. wlth Vhsm. The battie la net yet won, for there are aVili 40,000 little boys tolllng lu Vhs mines o! Eugland wben tbey sbouhd be ut achool, and Parliament wiil not stop thls shame-' ful scandal untIl we malté IL. \"But Vhe days wheu Lord Shaftesbury could plead lu Purliament for the cblld slaves o! England, and. have an audience o! Vwe, bave gone for ever. He saved the childreu who were belug slowly murdered lu our milîs and factoris; he saved the cbldren wbese eyes were bardly ever allowed to ses the sun. Mie saveci the littie cbîmney-sweeipa who were !orced up chimueys !rom tbree lu tbe moruiug tili Van at aigbt, and allowed Vo sleep the other five lieurs ou a sack o! seot lu a cellar. THE SOLDIER'S LOT. M R. MEE goes ou to describe tbe averuge British soluier who broke ths power o! Napoleon at Waterleo; sucb a mau as Wellington himaelf fourtesu years a!ter the Battie of Waterloo, described as \"the worst drunkard and probably the werst work- mnan lu bis Vown,\" and lesa than fi! Vy years ugo, tbe iiister for War teld Vhe Hous of Commous that iV had corne Vo be a question whsther the British Army should collapse or net. W4 could not geV men. \".Aiter tbe French warz were over, wheu huge suma o! money were being voted Vo Welington and Vhe efficers, iV waa proposed Vo reward the men, tee, and what do you tbiuk was Vo be their rsward for Waterloo? Lt was propoasd Vo rsward Vhem by limit- ing their flogging Vo a buu\u0026red. lashes I The fioggiug o! soldiers was se badl that the floggers would take iV lu shifts, anid a docter would stand by Vo say how much a man could stand wltbout dying. Weil, you may noV belleve IV, but IV là true, that Lord Palmers- ton eppoaed this concession Vo, the men whe béat Napoléon. IV was rejected, 1and Vhs flogglug weut on; sometimes a man would geV a tbousand lashea. \"«AV lat, wben the Victorian Bru was wshl on ita wuy, ,a soldier was floggsd, Vo death, and Parliameut then reduced the flogging to fi!ty lashes. And when do you thiuk this barbarism was stopped by Vhs Mother o! Parlaments? With a woman on ths throne sucb things could hardly lat long. Weil, 1 arn not borty years old, aud I was a boy at school when Vhs British Goverument proposed Vo abolisb this flogglng o! soldlers. qtbrougb ail the ysurs Viii then Vhs meu o! our .Armny were trsated like dega, or, worae than the law would allow any man Vo treat bis dog now. YeV, whsn théend o! this cruelty came, Queen Victoria wrote Vo Mr. Gladstone earnestly begging hlm noV Vo stop flogging, as IV would deprive the officers o! Vhs enhy power Vbsy bad o! keepiug young troopa lu order. \"1Vt la Vo Vhs sverlustiug benour o! Vhs, British Goverumeut that it replied Vo Queeu Victoria by aboliabing flogglug, and the abolition was !ollowed by a rush Vo the cohours. \"Only nine years before, ugain lu the teeth o! Queen Victoria and the House o! Lords, the Goveru- ment had ýdeprived rlch men o! Vhs control o! Vhs Arnmy by abolishing Vhs purchase o! commissions. 'The Nation,' snld Mr. Gladstone, 'must buy back lIa own army from. Its, own officiers.' But for this Sir TO THE SOLDIERS Q0 The folwîug eloquent article l'y M. Anatole Francs celebratlng Vhs festival o! Vhs 14th o! July appeared lu Vthe \"Petit-Parislen,\" and -la bers re- printed from the London Daîly Chronicle: ONE hundred and twenty-slx yenrs ago to-day the people o! Paris, armed with pikes and guns, to Vhs beatiug o! drums and Vhs rluging o! the tocsin, pressed lu a long line dowu Vhs Faubourg Saint-Antoine, attacked Vhs Bastille, 'and, a!Ver five heurs' conflict beneath deadly fire, Vook possession of ths hated fjortres$. A symbolisai victory won over tyranny aud despotism, a vlotory by wbich, Vhs French people inaugura ted a usw régime. The aovereiguty o! Iaw! Therein lies Vhs zIgnîf- cance o! ths Bastille, Vaken by ths people and razed Vo its fondations. The comlng o! justice! For that reason patriots weariug Vhs tricolour cockade iu their bats, -and citîzeilesses lu brooks' strlped wlVh the natlon's colours, danced ail nlght long te Vhs accom- paniment o! viollus, lu Vhs gay brilllance o! Vhs Illu- minations, on Vhs levehled site o! Vhs Bastille. Heur o! confidence lu humn goodnesa, o! faith lu a future o! concord and o! pence! Then did France reveal ber Vmse place among men, thien did as show with what bopes Vhs RevolulIon 8wshled Vhs heurts of Europe. Tbe faîl o! Vhs Bastille me- souuded througheut Vhs whole world. To Russa Vhs good idinga came like Vhs brigbt flame o! a ýbonfirs ou noms day o! public rejoeinlg. In Vhs prend city ob Peter and of Catherine nobles and serfs, wlVh tsars and cries of gladness, ernbraced oe another on Vhs public squares. The French Ambassador at Vhs Court o! the Empresa l'enrs wit- ss to this rupture: \"IV la impossible,\" hie writes, \"te descrîbe Vhs enthuslasm excîted amoug tmades- men, merchanýts, cîtizena, and Vhs young meni e! Vhs upper classes by this fail o! a Stute prison, andI titis fimat triumph of empestueus hIberty-French, Rus- sins, Dunes, Germuns, Dutchmen were ail con- gratulatiug and embruclng ons another in thesatreets as lf they had been lberated freni noms onerous bonduge.» ln England, werking men, ths middle-classes and .By ANATOLIE FRANCE TransIated 6v Wifr.d Stephent. Editor of *'The Book of France\" Vhs generous mînded among the arlstocracy alI me- Jolced, over ths victory o! rigbt won by Vhs people e! Paris. Neither did their enthusiusmi flug despits aIl Vhs efforts o! a Goverument strenuously hostile Vo Vhs new prînciples o! Francs Iu 1790, Vhs anni- versary o! Vhs tuklug o! Vhs Bastille wus cslebruted lu London by an immense banquet, presided over by Lord Stanhope, oue o! Vhs wlsesvt stutesmen o! Vths United Kingdom. These are Vhs memnories ws recaîl and Vhs avsnts ws celebrute Vo-day. THE RIGHT TO SPEAK. D BAR soldiers, deur fehlow-cîtîzens, I nddress yen on this grave festival because I love you and boueur you andtI hink o! yeu unceaslngly. I amn entîtlsd Vo spsak te yen heart Vo heurt because 1 bave a rigbt Vo spsak for -France, being one o! thos wbo have ever sougbt, lun freedom o! judgrnent and uprîgbVss of con4science, Vhs, beat mens o! maklng thelr country strolig. 1 am entitled Vo, speak Vo you becanse, net having deslred war, but bsing compsllsd te suifer iV, I, flke you, like ail Frenchmen, uni resolved Vo wags it, tili Vhs sud, until justice shahl have conqnered iul4Ùity, civihization barbarism, and Vhs nations are delUvered from Vhs monatrous menace o! an oppressive militarlsm. 1 have a right Vo speak Vo yen because 1 amrn e o! Vhe !sw who have neyer decelved yen, and who have'neyer 'be- hievetI that yen needed lies for the maintenance o! your courage; oue o! Vhs few who, rejsctîng us n- worthy o! you deceptîve fictions and mîsleacllug silence, have Veld yen Vhe truth. I VoltI you lu Dectmber l1ast year: \"This war wll be cruel andI long.\" I tellbyou now: Yen have dons mucb, but aîl la not over. The sud o! yonr labours~ upproaches, but is not yet, Yen are fightlng agais\u003e an snemy fertiflsd by long prepuration and Immense materlal. Your fe s ~uscrupulous. He bas leamnsd !rom is leaders that lnhuma.ulty la Vhs soldier's firat vlrtue. ArmIng blmself In a manner nndreamed o! hîtherte by Vhs mnost formidable of couquerers, he John French could ney'er have been the cOmlidi of our troops in France.int Similar conditions, or worse, were i!e l i Navy. Jails were deprived o! criminals that tl Navy might be supplied with men. The men t1 won the Battie of Trafalgar would neyer be toleratE in the Navy that now serves under JelliO( in the North Sea. The British Navy bas beE transformed even more than the Army Or t conditions of the workers in England. In the da3 o! Nelson and Wellington it would have beenl chimerical dream. to imagine auy Cabinet Mli1itý or parllamentary orator addressing the worlters 1 England as though they were free men and sOldie] upon whom the saving of the nation depended 0 much as upon the men in the trenches. THE COMING YEARS. TH-AT was the world that the fathers of liill. T Britons remembered; almost recent hitr the miuds o! living men. And the great so\u003c4e evolution ls stili going on. \"FI!ty years ago,\" sald Mr. Mee, \"the cause disease was as uuknown to men as it was 5,000 Yea ago; now we are conqueriug disease by cOnqueri]1 the cause. Plague, whlch ln one year sent bial! t people of Englaud to their graves, bas disappOe small-pox and leprosy have followed It; diphitblr cau beé cured wberever it ls found lu trne; 111d wbatever ignorant people may tell you-a guarant against typhoid !ever is off ered to everyAil soldier figbtlng lu France. '*And o! course we are going to stop alcobol, l euemy of every land and every man witbln IL e are going to stop driukiug It and make it drive 0 englues; we shall make It bulld up lnstead o! Pul down. Perhaps the greateat moral service tb science bas rendered the world lu these last t years bas been to prove that the teetotallers Io always been rlgbt. There ls no doubt about It e ail, and ouly Ignorance and lnterest -cari now e' this social use o! a poison *which consumes t strengtb o! men and women, robs cblldren O! thej birthrigbt, and strikes tbrough the normal li!e Of people as the German army strikes througb Belgie\" \"And povertyr wlll go. Our chlldren wiU l asbamed of ItL PaTliament la beginning to Put the Statute Book the old-fasbioned \"gospel tbSt ~J labourer ls worthy of his bfre. \"This shame is passlng away. We are ail age that the smallest wages mnust be blgh enougb tO lce0 human 'beings In com!ort. The princîple bas Pas beyond controversy, and ouly the detals have VO arrauged. Already every miner ln this country lia ,a legal minimum wage, as every !actory workeI' Australia bas; and four other trades lu Ku11el have wages fixed by Goverument, whicb can l wages when It considers It necessary.1\" FRANCE. causes rivera of blood to flow and breathes fOr vapours cbarged with torpor and with death. Endff preserve, dare. Remain what you are and none819 prevall aganst you. PRO PATRIA. V OU are fighting !or your native land, that Iag iing, fertile land, the most beautifulil' th' world; !or your fields and your meadoWs.Fo ,the august miother, who, crov\"ned witb* vlne-leeS and wlVb ears o! coru, waits to welcome you andIl !eed you witýh ail the luexhaustible treasures of l breast. You are fighting for your village belfrY, Yo roo!s of slate or Vile, wltb wreatbs o! smoke 0111'i up into the serene sky. For your !athers' gra-e your children's cradies.. You are figbting for our auguat cibles, on Vhse ba o! whose rivera rîse the monuments o! geýnaratill$ romanesque churchies, cathédrale, minsters,. abbey palaces, triumphal, arches, columus o! br01 theatres, ninseuma, Vowu halls, bospItals, gtatue siagesand o! heroes--whose walla, whetber D'Oeo or magnIficent, shelter aike commerce, indi5' science and the arts, ahl that constîtutes the beat o! li!e. You are fighting for -our moral heritage, ourInau ners,-our uses, our laws, our customs, our beleo our traditions. For the works o! our sculptors, 9 architeots, our painters, our engravera, our od ami Vhs, Our enamellers, Our glasa-cutters,OU weavers. For Vhe songe o! our musiclans. Forfo mother tongue whIch, with Ineffable sweetness, eight centuries bas flowed froni the lips of our Pe\" aur orators, our hlatorlans, our phtlosophers.Fo the knowledge o! mani and o! nature. For tbat 4\"y clopaedîc learnîing whlch attalned among us ti hlgh-water mark o! preclalon. and hucldlty. YoUlet flgbting for the genius o! France, whlch enlightb1i the worhd and gave !reedomn to the nations. BY noble spirit bastlles are overthrown. And 15$ly yen are fighting !or the homes of Belgians, EJl1' Paussians, Italiana, Serblan6, flot for France ieey but for Europe, ceasýelesshy dîsturbed and furfui' threateined by Germany'a devourlng ambition.",
         "THE COURIER. £ REAL S UM ME R HOM-E Where the President of the Canadian Car and Foundry may be Thinking About His War Con tracts Curry , l Summer Residence at Bay Verte. g-room ln Senator Curry's Summer Home, at Bay Verte. ln the foregroufld, a glimpse of a great garden; ln the background, Bay Verte. Samne of the relica and curlos ln Mrs. Curry'\u0026 Indian Rooam. ER of wealtby Canadians bo seeing less ot their 1er homes this year than Senator Curry la probably He bas been too busy bolidays. lu tact, since 'an the giant af Amherst Le of the buslest mon iu the warld. Hie regular Mvontreal, 'where the head \u003cJanadian Car andi Faon- a been since the amalga- Sthe Dominion Car and and the Canada Car Co. horne is at Tidnish, on not far from .Amherst, Rhodes-Curry Car Co. carniage sbop. Has tbe been thore lately to hear the sounding sea and fisb ,k8 beyond bis enchanteti rhaP8 not. re important te know Curry, of Nova Scotla, bas The Hall and Living Room in the Curry Summer Resadence. been able ta nab trom the British and the Rusian goeruments just about hait the war contracts se far placed lu Canada by Vlhese twe countries. He bas done lu Canada wbat Schwab did ln tbe United States. Scbwab wras net allowed te builti submarines at Bethlehem Steel Ca. for shipment to England. He ls building them at the \u003eVickers-Maxim Co. plant ln M4outreal. Senator Curry hadu't factories and foundnies eneugli lu bis coucern te fi ail the erders hie get from the belll- gerent nations. He farmed millions of them out In the United States. In the meantime, while the back-wash toams up lu the rear of his great gar- den en Bay Verte, the price ef Canada Car and Feundry stock la jumnping like a thermometer on a hot day ln the sub-Arctic. And if any day the Sena- tor sheuld take a day off ta bcat ou Bay Verte, he bas the satisfaction te knaw that ho is helping te win this war.",
         "TUHE COURIER. THE AWAKENING 0F ALDEN A Story of How War Reached Out and Took Hold of the Pour Erlan Brothers FROM Toronto, wbich Is a great cty, you reacb Alden by a sw-ift flight, a jog trot and a llrnp, w-hich Is te ssy. by a sories of trains, ef w-bich -the latter two are the w-orse. You leave To- routo early la the morning, about the time that Jimmy Becb gets down to the station platform ta w-sik around witb banda behiad bis back and se that things are moving ail right in tbe depot. You reacb London a\u003ebout tbe tîme tbe farmers from Port Stanley w-ay bave sold out tb-eir beans and potatioes and are shopping on Duadas Street, and You leave London w-ben the crowd at the Tecurnaeh House have ail flocbed la te dînner, leaving the bar deserted. About tbreýe in mhe aftornoon the sober, but self-re- specting train that snticed you from the G. T. R. station at London abandons You at a junction la a relermnedsw-amp w-hich is stili fertile la mosquitoes. At four the most abject train la the world, the most bang-deg, dow-n-at-'the-heel, shame-faced engine and string of cars, snesbs, as ît w-ere, out -of bldiug from behind distant hay-stacks, and efdies furtlvely aiong- aide ths piatform la mhe sw-amp. It Invites you aboard to the tuns of milk \"empties\" bsing rattled on or off the freigfbt car shead. This train, tbat bas a congeaital weaknesis la oae cyhinder, causing It Vo lisp painfully at every stop, draw-s Yeu through a rural pàradise, tbrougb fat, The Hoover Girl. w-arm fils and over snug, sieepy rivera meant for boys te awim in, aud srouud piurnp littie bille that hold up great rees on their bacbs se that Vhs trees may ses yau coenlng. Presently you fsar Vhat your ticket may be good for no moe or IV, and you descenxd somewhr-wherever you w-sre aimlug to go-nto a country-side full o! soft gloarnug aud hay-scentsd wlnds, anid terible stars that cons out early and stars IuVt te top o! your head flxedly. That la how you get Vo Alden though, if a certain train to Chicago frein Montrsal would only pause oee momesnt You could stop rlght off w-lthln quarter of a mile of- Vhs Alden posV-office. But that train has a horrible pride and a mean oye L.hat at nlght ia fixed aiways on soxuethiag very remoe frein Alden, an theugh Aiden once\u003c sent a disputation Vo ask the great Meibee, -before bie 4usd, te stop~ this train se as te let off empty egg-erates and old ladies wlth elastic.sl4dc \"c' _ I By BRITTON B. COOKE (Drawlngs by Arthur Lismer.) boots, Mabee said it couldn't be done. So it can't, and the 11igbt, the jog and the limp are as necesBary to.«iay as tbey w-il! be twenty years fromn now, wben a trust bas gobbled up the shoddy miii and the last raison d'etre for Alden shall bave been removed. But even so, it is wortb going. Personaliy, I love Alden, for It bas a charming siomethlng about It like those old fashioned women- that came to visit our grandmnotbsrs w-hen we were Young and wore mitts that had ibeen scented with strange gardenish odours; and it lives gently and soberly-very soberly since local option triumphed-and grows strange flowers, and sheds an occasional weak tear over sad bits of gossip tbat melt into, Ite earai lke balm. It w-orshIps w-ith greýat belief on Sunday mornings, and with a comfortable sense of Its ow-a rigbteousness under the patent oil lamps and tin reflectors Sunday n1ghts. Let the great train and tbe great commercial travelers w-itb cigars and silk socks go w-bisking by ln t-he distant as aloof as they may. Alden bas its own affaira, and I bave just seen la Alden w-bat I arn toved to write about, including the Reverend Jones, and the Widow Eriau, tbat grows dutch-sets for a living, and the Hoover.girl. \\WH EN I came down to Aiden, 1 thougbt that 1 could aurely leave 'behînd me the w-ar and the seven-columa beadlines about notbing w-bat- ever. 1 said to myself as 1 tbrew the usual items into the bottom of the sbabby club bag, w-bich is the cuýstodiaii of happlest miemories, \"I shall go down to Alden and forget about w-ars and tax-bilîs and puttiag the mllk ticket out at night and fishlng the paper la Ia tht mornIngs from the front verandab witbout letting tbe neighbours see the colour 0f oae's dressing-gown. 1 shall get the front room. to the lef t 0f tbe canaries la the hotel at Alden, and lI sît by tbe east window lu the mite of a dining-room dow-nstairs and l'Il bear notbing ahl day long but tbe squeak of the Alden Imperial chop mille macbl-nery. The pigeons on tbe roof of the ehoddy mlll, the bawl of far-off £attle, or the cry of a smali boy drivIag the mayor's stately cow down the main~ street under the trees to 'be milked, or the sonorous groanlng of the Hoover glrl's reed organ down under yonder big locust tree that makea such a sweet ameil la the spring.\" Thus dld 1 plan. There shouid be no more w-ar and 1 w-ould malie a treaty of peace w-ith the whlole world iby buying a ticket thither. But iV w-as nct se. 1 arn bers and 1 have feund the w-ar here also. 1 tbin-k I see it very much better fromn Alden than w-ould have been possible frein any place else. You ltnew Alden tlhree years ago. It carried lIa siomach wel forw-ard and its shoulder w-ell back la tbose days. So did w-sýll There w-as prosperity everywher'e. Tbe nayor-he bas -been mayor for thirtesu years on ead-was -'buying a Ford. The Hoover girl's mother w-as figur ig on a piano Instead of an organ, and Vhe seed of ambition w-as -aprouting la the head of every Infant la arms under the humble tr'ee5 of isolated Âi4en. -Jonas Toinkinson, Vhe lum- ,ber and ceai dealer, Persuaded Vhe counicil tbat IV needed oement sldew-aiks la place of the booss boards that gruxnbled pecishlarly under the slow- lest of people golng te cburch and that w-ors continually tbreatenlng if stepped on carelessly to fly up la the lace. Alden acoeptsd vement side-walks aud pald for thein by floatàlng strange things calied debentures. A TER a time the doctor-Doctor Phippea-con- t\"eslived Vhs brilliant Mdes, of putting la a amail second-band electric generator Vo use up some of ths head of w-ater frein the shoddy mili's dam, sud supply llghV to Vhe town. This he executed, and forth- w-itb Alden turned its light off and on w-ith a key ln- sýtead of blow-lng clown the'iamp cbimney or applying matches Vo w-lobs. Doc. Phippsn's boy, Roland, the big, handacuis fellow who playsd centre on the lacrose .- tearn, finished bis medical course ln To- rento an~d came back to Alden-where the Hoover - z, girl w-as secretly eating bier heart out about b and took over bis fatber's practice w-hile bis fi w-eut to tbe Riviera te spend the money he bad 1 on a w-estern land deal. Tbe two old maids ia the town, the Miss' Par blossorned on their iacreased mortgage Interest ýbought fine lace trimimings for the cuif s and Y of tb.eir old gow-ns, and badl hardwood flooring in their sitting room la place of the w-orn six- pianks that hail done duty la the days of their fi the Drover. The Widow Erlan, w-hose four reci 1. \\\\ The Rev. Peabody Jones. boys w-ere thre shame of~ Vhe industrious coin sud w-ho, w-hile ber sons w-ere at large -somew tbe continent, grew enion sets aud did a III linery and dresa-mabing for a iiviag-even s. pered a little s0 tbat as w-as bnown ta have la ber givings la the miasionary savelope of Vhs -Alden is Presbyterian. The Pastor, ReverE body Jones, subscribed for a two huadred encyclopaedia. Aidea grew fat and rich, and seven familles w-enV evsry year ail tbs w-ay ronte, either Vo the large fair, w-bich la tber fouad, oiý te Vhs Mendelssobn Chioir conceri of w-hicb events furnishsd Vopica; of conversa a great part of Vhe ysar and w-ere conslder of Vhs ediieation of Vhe best people. Slesk and comfertabie grew Aiden. Klnd- and dreamy-eyed it Iay under Vhe trees sue~] daily modicum of gessip, excited by the on, arrivai of the train, lulled to aieep by the trichle ef the w-ater from the tail race o! t and tbe music w-hich. Vhe Hoover girl aquee of Vhs resd organ by dint ef foot w-erk anc w-ork o! ths flrst order. When w-ar came Aldon w-as se comfortably la its place that it merely blinked and saîd and w-ont te slsep again. If Roland Phippen h; borne it w-oul-d have expected Roland te do soi about it. for Roland, by reason of bis father cent but persistent advertising of ths lad reason also of bis rexlown as a lacrosse pla3 as the handsome, good-naturecl, funl-~lovng sort e! public property, W0 every one, iacludlng Vhs girl, te w-hor it w-as w-blspî w-as secretiy \"engaged.\" But ~ w-as la the West maklng mi w-as said, -hand over fast È~ estate, and drlvlng aroui prairie lu large sutornobili doing s0 weh that Vhs doci father, iInVimaVed that iV m boueur to be alIow-ed even ~ ons letter a meonth from Vi se busy w-as hê. War, thE faund Alden without a bero it, and it settisd Ibacb Vo uýpon Vhs aewapapsrs. il greater imagination than cared Vo exerciae Vo suppoý a w-ar sn fgn. f-mf. - \"The cry of a ornait boy drlvlng the Mayor'. stateiy cow down the main street.,ff pow-er of Vhs British Nav socka and choiera boîts w f or, lV rosponded w-lth Wben volunteera fer Vhs]1 Vîngent were asked, IV",
         "THE COURIERI. -and had to refuse. Most of its Young eemned to be elsewhere in Canada. The West laimled many. But Alden was flot ashamed. It ertain things would be \"all riglit,\" and though the compliment of being asked to send is it refused graciously. The school-teacher lu days-lie was an elderly fellow near the re- age~-brought distinction upon himself by dis lig Iu the Mechanics Institute Llbrary-opeu fllghts a week-a copy of an almanac giving rengtb of the British Navy Iu 1903. This was eassurance to Alden. Its women, including the 1and the Hoover girl, went on knitting sockýs holera beits, and the Ileverend Jones prayed best tremulo for the quicli ending of the war be descent o! the old, complete Peace that had enjoyed so thboroughly. The Hoover. girl church orgun pluyed the most sootliing of Ires aud the choir sang, once a Sunday, \"Peace, ýt Peace\"ý--wjt a double meaning. News o! Il o! Liege and Namur was received with qui-et, ed indifference to anything the Germans might ýccounts of atrocities in Belgium moved the end Joues only to further applications for and hurmony. Aldeu stili slept well at nights a.d a cheery, innocent air in the moruings. It 900d conscience and a faith so great du the nacy Of His Majesty the King that it scarcely '. PHIPPEN had a letter one day. It was from RLolaud Phippen, In Saskatoon. Roland wunted moneY, on whlchý to corne home. Real estate ina drop! The doctor drew on the local anld repiied promptly. Roland arrived home days later iu fashionable clothiug, but some- Out of press. He had forgotten to ask for Il to iuclude bis eleeper. lie, hd sut up iu ýy cou-ches o! various trains thut had brought ',ast. Before, Alden could recover from the 8e, Rolamd Phippen announced týhat he was to the war. lat?\" sald tihe, Doctor. ,r,\" s\u0026id Roland. 'War? Wby, iny'boy?\" 3ause»Q\" saîd Roland, \"there's a lot of good fel- )YVer du France _there-anù they need baekiug Le,\" said bis father, thought!ully. \"I see, boy. Weil . . . I guess you'll have to go then.\"' \"Sure,\" suid Roland. \"I'm going dowu to Toronto týo train for a lieutenant.\" \"Ail rigfrt,\" assented the ýdoctor. \"You know best, boy.\", So Roland went. The Hoover girl, wlxo was not unlovely, heurd these things with lier great eyes still more solemu and her fine mouth held in a ýslightly braver curve than ever, froma Roland himself. \"0f course,\" she said. whieu he had filshed. \"I suppose one ought to go lu a case lîke that. And of course you must do your duty. But ds there any dauger-Rolly?\" \"Not a bit,\"1 he said, jovially, and whether lie gathered the Hoover girl-wbose name wus Lois- into bis arms or not and kissed ber-is not known and sbould not be known. At ail events be went away witb ail the marks .of a lieutenant on bus uuiform and the bearing of a major-general inedde, and Alden waved him go.od- bye witli the first touch of real feeling dt had bad since the wiar began. Old Jones gave Roland a testament. The doctor gave him a picture of bis mother, and tbe Hoover girl gave hlm a lock of something tied with a rilibon, wrapped lu white tissue paper and sealed. The second shock to Aideif came next day. The four sons of the Widow Efrluu had enldsted at various points lu the North-West-they stili caîl It the Nortli-West In Alden. Tom, that had run awuy with a circus; Billy, that had gone West with a harvesters' excursion and noever corne 'back; Jim, that stammered and could tbrow a quoit farther than auybody else lu Alden; and little Hal, the epitlire o! the family, wbose tougue bad b'ad to defend ýhim agaiuýst the superlor physiçal resources of his brothers-ail fhad gone; Jolned Iu oue regiment, the \"Little Black Devilýs\" of Winnipeg. And still Alden dreamed along and etili old Jones prayed for, Peace, and thougha prosperity was some- what awbated, there were stili luxuries and com!orts to be fourni lu Alden, and Spanlsh cakes with choco- late icingsto be had ou Sunday tea-tables. 'T HRE are three klnd and elderly hilîs round about Aldeni that seem to stand between Alden and the rest o! the world., They are not high bilîs nor rugged, iu fact every Inch of them, except where the trees still stand valiantly against the weather, Is under cultivation by the wlse and dili- gent farmers who live lu thi-s vicinity. Between two of the hilîs the river dnsinuates itself and escapes ou the side of the town where there is no blli at ail, but ouly a clear view over the hiot, sbimmering country-side toward Lake Erie, whose presence is indicated by the way the clouds arrange themselves on that side of the sky. Few people lu Alden know anytbing about the river farther than two miles above the old covered-4in bridge that helps the road cver. Aithougli the ticket agent at the station is intimate with sucli worldly people as the eugineer of the daily train and the conductor, even lie hasu't beeu far from Alden since he was uppoiuted here fifteeu years ago. Newspapers reacli Alden always a day late, s50 that Alden, even if ail the rest of the world came to un end to-niglit, would have au extra day of happiness. It is a s1hielded and protected place. O NE April uight came uews o! Langemarck. %JAlden, as it were, sat suddenly up lu its chair andi stared. There had been a great battle. Heroic tbiugs had been doue. Great sacrifices bad been made. Great losses had been sustaiued. But- aud thls was the point-lt was flot the old, old story of English or Scotch or Irishi or Frenchi heroîsm- it was Canadian! Alden bad neyer given mucli flhought to the terra Canadian before. It had ulwuys considered ltseif British and been content wltli thut, realizlng no particular relationship-except a geo- gruphical or an iuvestmeut relationship-with the f ar euds of the Dominion. This was suddeuly chauged. Tbhen came the second thought, second because Alden wus net accustomed to think of îtsel! as having uny close business witli great eveuts. Was Doc. Phîppen's boy ail rlght? Aud the four sons o! the Wddow Erlan? On a nigit, early lu May came a letter froma a sur- geon lu a Boulogne hospital. It w,#\" not addressed to the l3octor, as might have been supposed. It came to the Mayor, who ut the time was mllklng lu his own buck-yard. \"Open it, Lizzie,\" he said to his wi!e, who hud brougbt the missive from tle Post Office. \"See w'hat it is. Is it a bll?\" \"A bill? From France?\" (Concluded on page 18.) THE MODERN'PERIL ON THE ~iIy damnaged by sheti-fire fromn destroyers and gun- poked Its perlecope Into the danger zone In many to the North Soa. It somnetimos geto battered. Canadian troopa on board a transport don their lfe..preservers ready for any swlft boit fromn the blue. Every Canadian troop transport la so well oonvoyed by gunboats and destroyers that as yet flot a single casualty ha. been reported. S EA",
         "THE COURIER. M AIN L Y P ER SO0NA L Conversations in Camnera WHAT Kitchiener said to Joffre at the turne the accompanylng enapshot wais talion would bave been w\"rtli more to newspaper reporters than wliic Mephisto tbinlis about the Kaiser. Some weeks ago thoso two famous generalissimos met lu Calais. They linew thon, as tliey liuow new, that several hundred millions of people ail over the worid, not exciuding Germany, want to liuow why the Allies don't malie that great drive toe masli tlirough the German lines. They linow tlhat Russia was asilng the question as neyer se dld' lu the early part of the war whon she flung lier army into East Prussia to relleve pressure on the West. They linew thnt the Allied ai-mies lu the West are more tban twice as great 'as they wore at the Battie of the Marne, and that Ruiseia le faciug a bigger army than ýshe did lu October, wheu she drove the Germans backin Polaud. But these grat generalissimos, who betweeu then share the secrets of the Aliied ai-mies lu the Weie, sei to have said notbdng to relieve public anxiety on these points. What tbey said nobody linowe; -whether Kitchener spolie to Joffre lu French, wbich ho linows very well, or wliether Joffre returued the compliment lu Englieli. For moutha, now Joffre bas, been uibbliug. *For mouths Kitchener lias been«maesiug one o! the greateet ai-mies lu Europe. Why don't the, great ai-mies of the West smash their way thi-ougili? Lt's flot for the average man te linow; but we suspect that these generalissimos were talking somne of the turne about a thing o! whilb Napoleon had nover dreaned. That eue thlng was proba-bly concrete. It taies thousande et sheils every Ihour or se te maie\u003c any iimpression on those linos ot coucrete aud.,steel dug-in« that bouse the western ai-mies. And the groateet paet master of manoeuvres lu thbe world, wboevor he may bo, lias te learu the A B C of steel and cou- crete and shelie., No doulbt Kitchener and Joffre are as eager Vo break tbrough the Gor,man hunes as any cross--oad. critic lu Canada. But until thoro le welght enougli on those treuches te do it at a time and a place wboro tihe air-eyes of the enemy are not suspectlug lt--that breali-tbi-ough pi-ob- abiy -won't ho accompiehed. Ail the same, the world at largo 'would be glad te know jusit wbat theso two groat geuerals were- taling about lu Calais. Steel Talks MR. W. E. COREY, who ued Vo be pi-osident of the U. S. Steel Coi-liOf- tien, said on bis returu fi-un Europe the other day, that the Alles expeet the war te le-et about tbree yeare longer- He also thinks thle Uuîited States should lieep eut ef the war, because '11 would taie Vwe years Vo get the tUteod States ready te ho ot mucli use. Ho admits Vhat Aruerlea niglut *\"lick\" Spain or Portugal. Andi le aIse thinie the Grand Duke Nicholas le the greatest militai-y leader lu Europe. It's quite easy ta ses w-bore Mi-. Corey's sympathies lie. United States Steel me-y have predueed the- iuot-~ cinsequential peace advocate lu the world outside of Mi-. Bryau; but bis name, althougb it begins witli C, d'oesu'It happen te ho Corey. Auy7way, lie le not saylng much uow-that steel miau W~ho built the plunts that are now Kitc maiug munitions of wai- foer Europe, and ais the Peace Palace ait The Hague. Hoibrooke Abroad J OSEF HOLBROOKE le now lu the Unitedi States. Lot not the spelliug et his front naine unleleati you. Josef le an Englisbmen. Ho dos net uxake sauces, eit her; tInt main lu is namesake. Josef Hlolbrooke maies modern Englieli music, andi le le lnterested Just uow i gettlng semet ofit pe-rforuuod thil side et the Atlantic. If ail ges w-oU, orne ef his ballet operas, The Encbanitet Gardon, w-i ho beard lu Canada nazI October. Ho w-as thle fi-st EnglisI composer te w-rite music that people coulti ses lu plcturoe wbulo the orchestra playeti. He le fend of gleomy andi w-efrd things, i w-hioh respect lie býas caugi\u003et most of the mordorn Idea lu music. Ho loiks the part. Suapshettoti a-s le le-fl the steamuer, he closoly resemibledth ie laIe Franki Bulleit, wlho useti te write -wefrd thinge about the sea. As lie steeti ou lte dock, bis quidli oye caught s1511 of a w-nl-known Canadian composer among the iria et trafflo that sounda luke modern music. \"Ah!\" ie- salti te bis companion, \"tibere le a tollow- ciminai, another composer.» \u003cThe \"erlinal\" w-as the Canadian Ciae-nce Lucas. \"I arn lookixig for surprises,\" lie said. Wliereat the ca.stoms inspeotor promptly cliarged him $10 duty on hie modern music. In one thing Hoibrooke greatly deserves admira- tion: he lias neyer done much musical delving ini Germany. Wbatever weird thing e i ay write, lie is pure Engllsh. Hall Caine's \" Curtain\" HALL CAINE always tiiks lie is super-dramatie. The Manxman novelist bas been about as muni as Kipling of late, so f ar as fetcblng out new works is rÀncerueàT;* but the way lie bit off that fauciful aunivorsury description ýof liow one year ago four Cabinet Ministers 8at in the PremIor.s house waitlug for Gommany's reply, is a glorious piece of solemn \"ýbunk.\" The novellst, asks peoplo'e pardon for lifting the curtain on this memorable meeting. Here is a sample of oue of thecurtains lie lifted: \"As they sit there theelectric wires may be flash- îng thbe awful tidings litke a flying -angel of ife or death through the dark air ail over Europe. \"Thie four men are waiting for the télephone to ingu. Il d4oes nOl Ting, anti the fingors ot the clock are mo'elug. Tfhe w-orld seexus on tiptee llsteuing for the thunder stroke of rate. The MInisters at length sit sllent snd rigid, aiunost petrified, looking fixedly ait tihe floor or ceiling. \"TIen tbrough the aw-ful stillnoas ofthVe i-oin anti the pari ýoutsldo comes the deep boomn of Blg Bon- boom-boom-boom!\" Serlously, fihat curtain loois about -as i-éal as one et Mautell',s stage settlngs te Shakiespeare. Auy i-dîna-y city- adiler w-ould have lest bts job if ho bati manýageti te lot a reporter smuggle that descrip- tion past as a spécimen ot literai-y art lu lifting a curtain.9Êe9 Bourassa Ris Bete Noir THEIIE le a unlveri-sty professer lu Toi-onte w-ho reatis almoet everyrthing Houri Bourassa says in print or lu public, and the more le roade thle more disgusteti he gets. Ho can't help It. Foi yeare nowb h as madie Bourassa hie bote noir. Bourvassa's latest uttoi-ances ragardlug the w-ar mak\u003cý hlm grievously 111 lu lis rnud. Ànd they lave made a nuutbor ef people l11 lu thelr inde, te jutigo by the actions et thoso French-Canadlaus-uet the true iut, but the bogue variety-whe lad been tryiug te breakt up a re-cruiting revival lu theeost endi or Ment- réal. Lt is said that these insane persons went body Vo the office of Le Devoir, on St. James S tell Mr. Bourassa that lie was on thie riglit tra\u003c denouncing British navalIsm as being no better German militarism. Be sure Mr. Bourassa received those people dially. He is always cordial. Persoually, lie flot niake enemies. The worst lie can do in Pr le to frigilten anybody wlio tries Vo talli to hlm a' that big long table of bis in 'the office of Le DE But when he gets boi-d of his pen, bis eyes fury, land wlien lie rises before an audience0 flame with insane, unreasoning tires. Houri J assa was unýsatisfledwhen the world was rlglit up. Ho is just as unsatisfled now, when it le 111 down. The world will neyer be riglit Vo Henri assoa unrtil it îe a mueeum. But *if Mr. Bryan, m only off er Mr. Bourassa a nico sala-y to go ovel help hin stump for peace without honour, or dig or ýanything worth wlbile, lie would be conferi great favour on thýis country, We know Mr. Bou' is a brilliant mani. We aiso know that lie has lis brilliance to magnify Mr. Bourassa and to il the land of bis bîrth. The Gamny Grand Du\u003c AKE hlm ail lu ail for every inch 0 six feet tlireo, we must admit .T the Grand Duke Nicliolas is a P gaine kind of w'arrior. No other goner the world'e hlstory had to nove s0 1 armies and men rani gune andhorse5. munitions of war, apd even popul'atiol towns and cities over sucli vast ai-oas eM rref a space of time. No generai S fouglit se many rearguard, actions s0 nlflceutly. No leader ever got bis armici of au abandoned fortrese ieavlng lesE tihe beiegor ami, sufferlng less damnai hie own Unes. No master of strategY had to'resigu himiseif to taklng great resees againet heayy odds, scaling i mountalus agaInst worse oddà, ouiy t4) r and lot the forte go bacli to the enemlY, the mountain passes gid-e away frein u te feet of hie armies, and stili keeP linos intact ready for action, somewhi-O No generalissino ever had at bie baue many millions of men tbat ho oouldu't tor lacli of rifles, ammunition and -big and oven uniforme, whlle ln front of were millions wlro lad ail these things to spare. 'Me Grand Duke may ýnot b engineer. He may not underetaud siege fare hundreds ef miles long. But lu hiE meindous maneuvres with maillions of lie becomes to, Vhe popular 1magInati \u003c . weird, wlzard-llke figure that belongs tc drean-worid of the unattalnable. 99l V1 ,W l Getting Adventures SNLY knowu Canadian, officer se iu the Dardanelles Ie Lieut. DO' Hal]am, son ef the late Aid. Hallan, ef Toronto. \"Deug,\"1 as he cuown by bis near assoclatee, jei at p-E invalidiug lu Engiaud, being flvo t wounded and etherwlee fil; but froox wb knowu of bis adveuturous seul cooped 1 a wlzened, rositiese nerve-cage of a bW: wll not be long careslng bis cot. HSB wae men'tloned by Sir Ian Hamilton il spato1hes. Ho may be mentlonod agalIu. wae always llkely copy for nowepape-5, 5\u003enth. tihough lie put iu a few yoars mialcug on the Toronto Tolegram. Betore thus spent su'me whule as au expert amateur camiera and whhle eugaged, lu flasbligbtlng for Satu Nlgbt some years ag~o got muet Of one band b off. Ho wae thon îre.ýh tram the TJlverslty, 'w be wae always one of! the radicale wlt\u003ehout bel firobran!d revolutlonary. Sînco 11e quit neffl work lie badl been engaged iu buk5ineee-wbl6 maialiy bated, and lu learnlng to fiy, whlc eb li botter thau eatlng. When thé war broke OUI w-eut wltb the Furet Contingent, 'but afté0e shiftd te 1the uavy as a meniber et the flylng c Ho le uow for the first time, aceordLlng to lus reaily engaged lu Ilving-w'ltl deakh seule1 round the corner waittng au opportuulty. AUIFO\u003cRM lias a lot to do wlth maklng a rée1 like a soldier. But tlhere are a young men lu officers' uniforms lu tb.ls try who -w'ili have te get blgger tiban theli- uit before their toge are mudi use to thon, Wbat DI a man an officer inetead of a prlvq.te? Not the ef lis commission. More likely it'e the tact thi business 1lfre lie lad initiaitive and admlinStr -abllity; wbli in a war of applled scienceý ls tue@ of manx t4hat le uneet nieedod te tell other mn to do. Brains are as Important lu soldlorlng as5 lu i any otiuer klud ot business.",
         "THE, COURIERI. This Poliah village, with Rusalan prisonera WHAT THE TEUTOKS ARE GEtTING. In It, la a sample of what the Germans are gettlng now that they have captured Warsaw. 7HAT DOES WARSAW MEAN TO US? RIAT does the faîl ot Waraaw mean te the average man in Canada? Most of us bave nover been i Warsaw. Last e began to read about the struggle of the to keep the Teutons out of Warsaw; how succeeded and drove the Austro-Germaris Afterwards we became more interested e capture etf Lem berg, the taking of LysI,' the storming o! the Qarpathiaris. lYsI and Lemberg are both back ln the of the Teutons. But we said that made Il difference to Canada, and England, and e and Italy. Wait tilI they get Warsaw- 1, thoy have got Warsaw-arid now what? LInY worse than gettIrig back the other two 'holds lri Galiela? Much. We knew that )ad enougb, bocause wbe.n the Russieris those stroigihoida we hurrahod about It acroas Canada. Bravo the Grand Duke! ,id ho was a great conqueror. Hie was the 'or of the great steam roller thait would its wayinto Berlin and Vienna., the steamn rolier didl't do it.ý The Grand let the twa, Galician cities slip back again Germans, who went lnto tantrums of Joy- 'eli they migiht- Then came the blgger rIe to get Wnrsaw, whicb the Kaiser ýii- 1 te have last iali because be bad failed- Paris arid to hack bis way through to for the purpose of sbooting 42-cm. shelis Ithe Channel Irito Erigland. Paris could Calais could wait-but net so long. Mean- Daralyze the Russiana, who were strorig il and weak on munitions; drive them, back ,aek arid then again-,go far tinte Russie. 10aug1 they sbauld save their armies, they ~be aR long while ýgetting back to their old ficOft offensive. )ae Oie Russians wont-still golng back. 'ho Warsaw \"salient', was given up, 'lie atrategists said tbat triangle was im- 'le to hold ariyway with Hindenburg arid ý11'SOr and Von Buelow hammering at it 0.orth, west anid south. The Riissians have an eaier job whon the linos were htelled. Since they couldn't do It by hold- 1 te Iiberg and Przemiysl, they must do le1thn go of Warsaw. Ail the miiitary Sald4 80. The eivilian agreed. We must F,1F30.w go-if we must. thu0t Canadians should use -the word \"we' king about Warsaw. Why a year ago the WKAT WE ARE LO081tG. The web of forts, cities and raliroade whlch the Germans are gsttlng wlth the capture of Wai'saw. most we knew about it was that its first syllable was war. But we are 'begînning to understaud that until the British and Canadians and French and Russians and Italians and Serbians and Montenegrins get to the point where they can say \"1we\"l as well as tlhe Germans and Austrians and Turks are doing it, there is nlot much use wasting wind trying te show how ta win tiiswar. The loss of Warsaw bas begun to affect-Uis. When we let the Germans gest Warsaw we let themget the -biggest prize they have got in their whole programme of fallures on one front and succosses on the other. We did our best to keep them out of It. We landed, huge arniies In France and Belgium. Tihe land behind the British lines in Belgium and France is teeming with British soldiers who have neyer yotseen a trench. Why? Because we are derterminod that the Ger- mans shan't break tthrough to Calais. If they got Calais we know what they mig4ht begin to do to Dngland. The harder we made it for týhem to break through to Calais, the harder it would be for the Germans to get Warsaw. We began to realize that Warsaw and Calais were two points which. it was our business to defend. W E have kept Calals-and Canadians well k!now bow It was done. We have loat Warsaw; and we are' just beginning to realizewhat that means ta the business of hold- ing Calais. We have no doirbt about belng able to do It But with the Russians driven back from Warsaw, over the tbreo railway linos to Petrograd and Moscow and Odessa, ýback nearer the- headquarters of the Grand Duke, we begin te get it hammered lnto our heads that the Ger- maris may now be able ta releaso an extra mil- lion men to swing them back over to their busy linos of steel to the frontler where the holding of Calais is the main British business. 0f course ail these tremendous struggles are wearing the Teuton armies down. Montbs of nlbbllng by Joffre bas woru them down as montha of, xnanifIcent manoeuvres by the Grand fluke have worn them down. But They are not'yet worn out. The blond beast frorn Berlin îa still lni the ring, and be Intends ta mako at leaat one more coamie strugglo to get Calais. \u003eThon we shaîl know how the Russia felt when ho was closding the glgantic pincera on Warsaw. The gre'at drive whieh the Allies were ta make may now resolve itelf Into a terrific defensive ta hold Calais-and at the same time to wear the German armies out on the western front.",
         "Is Bourassaism Dangerous ? SOME comment la this journal on Bourassaism has called forth comment from. readers. Two or three interpret the Courier's remarks as belng disparaging ta the French-Canadians, which is manlfestiy ridiculous. Bourassaism is nat canflned ta French-Canadians. Others place the blame of the recent antj-enlistment disturbances in Montreal an the milftary officiais. That Bourassa and the Nationaliste are dolng everything they can to preveat enlistment le clear. They do nlot believe in war, and they abject ta see- lng Canadians fighting on behaif af France and Great Britain. They abject ta the Union Jack and the Canadian Enslgn, but consent ta wave the tri- calaur while refusing ta ftght for it. There are men wlthout nationality and without any sympathy for those who are fightlng vallantly for lberty af falth, conscience, and national develop- ment. They are even without sympathy for bllghted Belglum. That aur readers may have bath sides af the ques- tion, two letters are attached: Edito Cauler:Montreal, July 30th, 1915. Sir.-Because somne people resent threats, it is hardly fair ta blame ait the people. Des Ormeaux and his brave comipanlons sald their prayers, made their wlhs and bravely gave their lives for their country and saved their country from, the Iroquois. Many a brave, yaung Canadian speaklng Frenchi as bis mother tangue, bas already left to fIglit In France and F'landers, and many, many more are ready and willng ta go, and I venture ta praphecy some of these will bring undying glory ta tbls god, old Province of Quebec and the Empire ta whicb we ail behong. Tours truly, SAM. J. MATHFJWSON. been brought about by the war, and, therefore, Canadai should rejoice that the war has brought us such pros- perity. There can be no other meaning in your state- ment. The war has artlficially checked imports and brought about the exact conditions for whîch our pro- tectionist pohiticians have labored for tbirty years or, mare. The war has done the trlck witbout even their assistance. Let us then glorify war, for It bas dane for us what a high tariff and the apostles of privilege bave been unable ta do for us In thlrty years. Yea, veriîy how great and good are the benefits conferred on us by the war. Has It neyer occurred ta you that no gonds would be imported into Canada at arnytime if Canadians did nlot want to buy them, and they would not want to buy them if It were not evident tbat these goods offered the begt value for the money spent, and when people are prevented from buylng 'in tbe cheapest market, their purchasing power is serieusty imapaîred? Did it neyer occur ta You that aur excess of imports over experts in aur prosperous years merely represented our borrowingsn In that period, and that inteýrest is payable annually on those borrowlngs to the tune of 150 to 200 millions a year ? Did it ever occur ta you that that interest is pay- able in merchandise, not dollar bills, and tbat this pay- ment of interest wlll be counted as an excess of experts and hooked up ta as a mark of prosperity by psuedo- economîists of the protectioniet strIpe? Has It neyer oc- curred. ta you that aur experts must be lncreased by another two, and a quarter millions next year ta meet the lnterest charges on those cheap bonds sohd In New 'York the other day, whlcb, according to your argument, meanis further prosperity? The more we send out, and the les we bring In, the riober we grow. That argument bas the philosophy of Bernhardt and .Von Tirpitz beaten by a mile. Has It neyer occurred ta you how silly It Is for PUBLIC OPI N 101N_ Edltr Cnadan ourer:Montreal, August 5th, 1915. Sir:-I am a new subscriber ta your paper. in the niumber tbat 1 baye just received, that af July 3lst, 1 read a short editorial note under tbe title \"BouraSSlsm.\" Allow me ta maie the remark that It Is dIfficult, In se, few lines, ta be more unfair, unjust, untrue and mafici-' ans tawards M. Bourassa and his political princIphes and \\V utteranees. Evidenthy you are wronghy infarmied. Tou do not rend. or eanhnot read, M. Bourassa's9, or yen read hlm thraugli somne of your toa numeraus English argans who syste- matically and delftberatehy dlatort or falslfy what hie writes or says. I concede to you tbe rigbt of yaur apin- ion with regard ta this gentleman or ta what yau cai \"Baurassism\"; but, Wbat I bave thse right ta dlaim In your editorlals, as a subseriber ta your paper, le sin- cerity, truth and fairness. Witb regard ta these manifestations in this clty against conscription, whieb were regrettable, the real respon- sible parties were Messrs. Ballantynie, Dawson and Col- onel Wilson, Commanding Officer of thîs district, who prevfausly in public speeches threatened the 'working- men and deelared that \"men sbhould enliat mare quidkly, and that If they didn't voluntarily, they would have ta in some other way.\" 1 want ta believe that the spirit that prevails in yor papexr is aone of sincere good faith, justice and truth wlth regard ta religious and politîcal opinions; otherwise J wo¶i14 ask you ta lmmedlately cancel my subscriptian. Slncereiy yaurs, A. J. LAURENCE. The 'Balaince of Trade ON E of aur readors, at least, keeps trying ta prove that the Courier is advocating certain doctrines conceruing the \"Balance of Trade,\" whlch hie thinke vicions. Hie reads into certain comn- mente meanings whlch. are flot lntended. The Courler's position le that if our exporte do nat equai aur imports, then we must borrow fromn abroad ta pay for the adverse balance. If Canada's exporte exceed hier Imports, then titis surplus wll 1elp pay our intereet bills abroad. Of these two situations, we prefer the latter. We do nat maintain that anc je bad and the othjer good. Bath mnay be good, but they are different, Perhaps the following letter from this particular critie wil help te make the issue between hiui and us chearer. If anY other readei, would like ta get into thse flght, let him corne on. This is a fair fild and no farours. Here is the letter: Mantremi, Âug. 4th, 1915. Ediler Canadian Caurler: Slr:- r \"There le non~e sa blind as hie who wll not see.\" Your article \"Better .titmes caoing,- hast issue, page 12 and \"Canada trade,\" page 22, 'wIi no doubt bring joy ta the hearts ai the unsophisticated. As one of your regular readers, 1 'w~ould asIC you ta not ke6p us In sus- pense, but tell us exacotly ta wbat point Imsports must de- chine and exports isicrease t» have the golden ag. once more in aur midst. TVhe pracesa bas been going gtK steadlly for tara Years, becamlng mpore accentuated as the months go Iby, but altbaugh Imports reached the minimum and exports the. maximum in the manth ai Juhy, 1 amn tald 1w trades people ail aver the Daxniln that trade wa3 neyer s»o bad s ast month. When, oh when, wlhl the good tintes be ber.? Wlh lt be whrn there are no imports and nathing but exports? Ti Present conditions of export and import trade have our statisticians at Ottawa to include gold and s: the records of imports and experts? Many mniii dollars in gold have been exported from. Canada last few weeks, and although it did nlot even be' us, it is included in our exports and belped ta sm expert figures on which you base the aigns af Out perity. Was there ever such falsity of reasonuin side of the German Empire? Just tblnk of Il.I ing other people's gold, a sign of prosperityr Y what depths of thought. Did it neyer occur to you that a great portion experts at present are for destructive and not col tîve purposes, and that for every dallar's wortb c that we send aur European friends, their purc power wull be reduced by .Iust that much when t] is over, unless we can persuade tbema ta make petual, se that we shall continue ta have pipirtg of prosperity, such as we are enjoying now, and , lng ta enjoy when imaports cease altogether? Let u that the war will cure some of these Germnan egati It 15 curing many of, our jugglers wlth the bals trade theory, as is attested by hundreds of prote( organs and politicians, who have for the past yea telling us about the awful industrial depression, Is ateadîly growing worse. Wake up ta the facts situation, my friend, and give your readers soin~ mare tangible than your trade balance tbeary Or' to base their hopes for brlghter days, otherwise wili lose confidence in Yeu. Canada is now feeling somne stimulus consequenl the destruction of property by the war, but in t] she will also feel the depression due ta the dec purchasing pawer of Europe. Trade In Its last a] Is barter and industry \u003cexceptlng the toit laid On monopoly), Is conducted on a co-operative basis. ever loss faits on any business, must ultimately by ail the units. Europe ls losIng what It had. C will be deprived of what it otherwlse would hav had the war not oecurred. To bath, the war Is W1 be an economte evil. Tours very truly, JOHN ANDERý",
         "THE COURIER. ROWING AND CANOEING CHAMPIONSHIPS Junior Eights at the Canadian Henley, St. Catharines, Ont., 'the Toronto Argonauts (Duke) were the wlnners; Detroit 2nd, the Britannîasf rom Ottawa 3rd, and Argonauts (Martin) 4th. This picture shows the finish of the race. j Last Week's Regattas i' CHAMPION BOB DIBBLE. fully defended the single scull championship c ist Butler and 8h ean. His brother, Harry DibbIe won the Junior singles. WAR may have lessened popu- lar Interest in basebail, but it lias flot Interfered with Canadian professional efficiency in rowing. The Heliley Regatta at St. Catharines last week demonstrated theî aithougli more than half the memibers ,o! the 'Canad!lan Associa- tion of Amateur Qaramen have gonea to tlhe front ais solidiers, it was pos- sible for two Toronto clubs, on the final day, Saturday, to win seve-n of the leading events in ail classes against flot onlyý , anadian clubs, but also competitors from Philadel- phia, Buffalo and Detroit. The heroes of the occasion were tlie Argonauts, Who won five of the lead- ing events, with the Dons, aise from, Toronto, winning two. Toronto seems cut ont to retain the rowing pestige which she aohieved a gen- eainago In the world-wlde vie- tories of Ned Hlanlan. But that prestige la no longer In the produc- tion o! single scullers, althougli even that champlonship at the Canadian Henley this year went to Bob Dibble, the veteran Don oars- man, against Everard Butler, of the Argonauts, and C. Shean, o! -the Buffalo Celtics. It was In the eigihths, the foursi and the doubles that 'the Argonauts scored. At the Canadian Canoe Associa- tion meet, on thelkme day, 'on To- ronto Bay, the Balny Beach \"kids\" tooli over the trophy for -points from eight competitors. Chie! among ftheir opponents were the Toronto ~,Canoe Clu(b, owiiers o! this trophy since 1906. WINNERS SENIOR C. C. TANDEM. Clements and Laing, of the Grand Trunk Canoe Club, Mont- real, won the Canad Ian championship from a good field, includ- ing Iast year's champions. ly Beach won moat honours at the Canadian Canoe Association Meet, the Toronto Canioe Club won the Junior Foura, wîth Parkdale 2nd and Baîmy ,Beach 3rd.",
         "THlE COURIERI. THE CA NA DIA N C OURIER PVULSHED EVERY SATURDAY BY COURIER 'PRESS, LIMITED) loi SimcoE- ST. EDITED BY JOHN A. COOPER TORONTO, AUGUST 14. 1915 A Position for Bourassa N W that Hon. Dr. Moutagu bas been \"ordered\" te the front ta Joln the Army Medical Staff, N wby -not \"order\" Mr. H~enri'Bourassa ta tht front to join the staff o! army interpreters? Ho is a splendid bulluguist and would lie a cliarming acquaintance, Besides lie could lie of material liter- ary assistance to Sir Max Altkeu, while bis pollteUal knowledge miglit be belpful to our other leadlng representativo, Hon. Col. J. J. Carrick, M.P. Gambles and Bargains MEN wlll have their gamblo. It was always so and always wlll be. Tbree years ago it was real estate. Te-day it is steel stocks. The gambler le buylng and selling conunen stocks; the inveeter le buylng proferred stocks and bonds. That îe a distinction which the observer would de well te keep ln mind. ln the meantinle there are bargalus te be secured ln real estate, bonds, and sucli stocks as are not cennected wltb war orders. The wlse man wlll not overlook tliem, Machine Guns LET us assume that the Canadian army le short o! machine guns. Let us also assume that this wave o! patriotie buyiug o! machine guns le advleable. But wbo ie te say 'what kind o! machine gun shail lie bouglit and where oach machine gun shall bo secured? Until these points are settled, le it not a bit foolleli te go on ralsing meney for sucli purchases? Would it not be well to de thie patriotie work lu a, regular, orgasiIzed and itellgent inanuer. Our informuation le that thero are ne machine gune fer sale, and that noue can be secured insido o! six menthe. The Coming of Borden RUMOUR had it that there weuld lie a general R election in Octeber. The pewerful elemeuts withiu the dominant party at Ottawa were determlued on it. If Sir Robert Borden objected- well, so mucb the werse for Sir Robert Borden. SIR ROBERT BORDEN Who le belng llonlzed in Engtand. When h. returna to Canada ha muet decldo whether thera wiIl b. a coalition mlnlstry or a general electioni. That was previous to August 6th. On that day there was an election in Manitoba. Since then the attitude was clianged. Now the question of an elec- tion in October will lie left to the decision of Sir Robert Borden. Everybody agrees that lie is the one man to decide the important question. When Sir Robert cornes home lie will favour one of three courses: first, to liold an election in Oc- tober; second, to liold an election in September, 1916; or third, to form a coalition government which will last until the war is over. Adam, Monopolist SIR ADAM BECK always was a monopolist. Since lie was placed in charge of tlie buying of horses for the Canadian army lie lias shown his dom- inant characterlstic. He refuses to allow the British and Frenchi authorities to buy horses in Canada. As a consoquence, large shipments of horses f rom the United States are being made into Canada every woek for the British and Frenchi buyers wbo have lieadquarters hero. Up to date, the monetary loss to Canadian farmers by Sir Adam's desire to monopolize the buying in this country, is probably in'excess of tliree million dollars. This is a rather large price ta pay f or a laurel wreatli to adorn tlie crown of even so eminent a citizen as Sir Adam Beck. Sir James Aikins Saleader of a forlorn hope in Manitoba, Sir AJames Aikîns lias not added to bis reputation. His political friendq may admire bis courage in taking liold of a discredlted party in Manitoba and tryîng to, save it from extermination. But th'c people of Man!- toba plainly re- sented lis nietli- Sir Jamies is a fine man, but lie lias neyer been accused of beîng a leader of men, As a corpora- tion lawyer hie y won success. As 71 a speculator in wealtli was eas- ily gathered In the West, lie was a success. As a smootli, pleasant figure at a Metliodist Conference li e SIR JAMES AIKINS, K.B. w as charnming. As a man wlio would fight for tlie public and go down to defeat for a principle, if necessary, lie liad no record wliatever. 'As a leader lie was an unfortunate dlico, because ie- had few of the qualities wihich mako for leadership. Sir James broke lnto politics late In life-too late te make any impression at Ottawa, wliere lie has served for somo years. Hie only notable achieve- ment sinco lie secured a seat among tlie two hundred and twenty-ono gentlemen wlio make up the present House was. the securlng of Knigitliood. Wliy lie was se lionoured lias nover been explained to the satisfaction, o! the public. Certainly bis grasp of publie questions and bis debatirlg abllty is not to be compared with tliat of men like Hon. Arthbur Meiglien or Dr. Michael Cark. The disappearance of-ir James Aikins fromt pub, lic life, now tliat be bas been rejected by the people of Manitoba, would not create any acblng void. This is not \"aId to be unklnd. Sir James bas not the equlpment to mnake hlm an indispensable leader in tbe publie if e of tbe Dominion. Manitoba Vindicatçd CORRUPTION in the go'vernment of Manitoba bas been condermned by the people of Mani- Stoba. Tlie corruption was in the politiclans, net in the people. The results o! the elections beld on Frlday o! last week are cloar proo! of that. Canada bas thîs te its credit-no government. fed- oral or provincial, -was ever ehown clearly te be cor- rupt, wltbout adequate îpunlshmoent bolng metod out at the poils at the first opportunlty. The Pacific scandal put tbe Ceneervatives out of power at Ot- tawa in 1894. The proved delinquencles of the Ross Government ln Ontario was follewed by its Imimedi- and party advautage. The Roblin Governmexnt je eut and the Nerris Goverument le in. Both Liborale and Censervatives voted te wlpe eut the stain wblch the Roblin Cabinet had put upon public 11f e iu the Province o! Manitoba. It is not a victory for Liberalism s0 mucli as tory for dlean administration. If tlie Norris G ment does not introduce new ideals into thi vincial -administration, it too wlll be condeml, empliatically as its predecessors. It is to lie lioped tliat tlie lesson will comle to every government in Canada. The part SIR ADAM BECK Who la arousing much discontent through thi try because he refuses to allow the Briti French authorities to buy horses here. F dlaim to have lost millions by this poli( rules for part3i advantage, instead of public tage, wil11 soon feel the beel of tlie electoral approval. Tlie result Iu Manitoba should h appreciable effoct on political practicos at Toronto, Victoria and other governinental ce: The Shortage of Ships ONE reader o! the Courier sends us con, tions on the articles from timoe to, time journal concerning the eliortage o! s carry Cauada's foodstuffs to Great Britain. tliat our agitation bas causod the Canadian ment toi take up the question wlth the Britis orities, and that somnething will be done to tlie deficiency whldli now exists. This gentleman may be well lnformed. E' wlll hope wbat hoe says le true. Ne-vertliel, desired improvement is net yet in siglit. T tisli Columbia people complalu that it is diff get vesels in whlcb to slip coal and lumbo maxnufacturers o! war munitions find it bard spaco lu the vessels on botli the Atlantic and Sir George Poster may bie deallng with tli tion, but there is no0 evidonce that lie bas pllsliod much. Ho should not forgot that if 1 a shortage of vessels iu Septembor and Octol lie wfll lie held strletiy to account by the The task is not easy, but the oinus of proof d14 everytbing possible will be on hlm. RiE dld recruitlng speeches and the multitude 0 -duties develving on hlmn as acting Premier no excuse for the neglect te solve this most ant problemi. Unemploymnent ALL sorte o! local cemmittees are struggli will continue to struggle witli the que-, unemploymoent. 'These earuest, would be-useful citizens make as 4e showing iI efforts as a hlghly pepular Mayor dos W] tlirows the first, ball at týhe openinÏg gaine season. Tliey bave no knowledge of econolfli no appreclation of the underlying causes of ploymont, a sleuder knowledge o! humnan natu consequently tliey accomplieli notling. The unemploymnent problem whlcb bethi large cities durlng perlods of economlc readJil canuet lie wholly solved 1,y any eue. The 01] sons wbo can com~e near te offering remedi those who bave speut their lives in studying t. and oconomic probleins. It' is a subject fer E Wben amateurs attempt te deal wlth it, theY make themselves ridiculous. In the United States, the people have learn, it le a question whicb must be selved by exPe: the Federal Gevernment bas turued it over te tralned students e! economic,probloms. Th result must come iu Canada. The Mayers route and Mentreal trled te deal wlth it last and falled mlserably. Tliey wîîî try again tb ter and tbey will fail agaln. A national 1 manned by expert ecouemiets, flot politicilen5, help, Sudh a national bureau 'weuld need supplemneutod by provincial bureaus working\u003c mouy wltb it. But, before Canada can b reacli a solution, the people miuet realize thi as mucli the work of an expert 'te fiud that 5 as it le the work o! an expert to run a Clii 1bank, bulld a rallway bridge, or invent a neý pl~ane.",
         "THE COURIER. TH E SI1G N 0F TH E MA PL E A NEWS DEPARTMENT MA I N LY F OR WO ME N oneymoon or Moneymoon? JE have had sucli pathetically quiet wed- dings this year, ail owing to the fact that the bridegroom le a young lieutenant or captain, reacly for departure for service ýas, that it ie almoet a relief to read o! the (JIy elaborate nupMals of the thirty million Young person wbo became the wife o! Mr. diug, of Chicago, or some place like that. The 3t rumours were rampant, that the bride re- 1 One hundred threatening letters, of which the terrifylng insisted. that seventy-five thousand s muet be pai'd to a needy citizen or the bride- k irould be abducted. The bejewelled guests, lulnerous and costly preeents had to 'be pro- by a speclal force, of officers of the law, and, tber, Mr. Forgan, the guardian of the opulent must have beaved a sigli of relief when the parkle, o! diamond dust confetti shone on the latf orm *of tJhe car which bore the ,happy bwealthy couple off for a lune de miel journey. les and Sentiment \u0026~KING of weddings, there was a paragraph In be Toronto papers last week concernlng two Oung girls o! thait city who bave joined a club rvaad, the inenbers o! whloh refuse to consider roposals o! marriage until they have reached ature age o! twenty-five. Even then, the lowest tender is not necess-arily accepted. The youth )raPoses must be making, at least, two thou- dollars a year, or he will noet be taken it leration. au 'a possible busband. These are re- tbly sensible conditions, but we question the .ty o! tJhe club. The president will, no doubt, tengaged at the age a! twenty to a young na bank wlho is passing ricli on seventy-five Ba inontb. ,lia and Danger R»N1CHMAN, visitIng recently in London, was arnl«zed at the liglht-hearted audience at the OO)liseum, applauding the clever performance Charles Hlawtrey and apparently forgetting agedy o! the trenches net very far away. If flglisbman. takes bis pleasures sadly, it must lern7bered that he takes bis dangers cheerily- le very fact that, le is a)ble to, keep the theatres 90es far toward-s explaining the difflculty o! ng him to despair. It is not recklessness, but Ous caolness o! bead which enables him to eit Ind even applaud Uhe comedian, wblle the very e 15 a-quiverng.HRe is not callous-merely ýed. BRIN. ýecojrd of Splendid'Servi.ce ANADIAN woxnan «wbo bas respOnded ta the. cail wblch bas corne from stricken Serbia is br. thbe ',-Môn. Eila Scarlett-Synge, o! Van- Who sied frem New York on July 31 for la, from which point she will journey ollika, thence cta Nlsb, Serbia, wbere Il Offer lier servi-ces te the unfortunate Y 'which bas 'been so terribly ravaged r and Pestilence. Il the people who have made sacrifices 1 war, it Is doubtful If there are any. aVe shown greater heroism than, thé I womnen wbo are fighting the dreaded 1 and Its accompanylng I11e In that Y- The Àmerloan Red Cross Maga- lakes the statement that as a result [line and disease, fully one hundred ~Ild Dersons have perlehed there since Ir began, and'of these the great ma- have been vic'time o! typhus, and It ýB5Ued an urgent appeal for more Scarlett-Synge knows the difficulties e dangers mthioh eue will have to face »erilous mission wbicbi she hais un- en, and~ the work in wblch sbe wll w1Ul Iot be altogether new to ber. ac~tive service wltb the British Army SCorps ln South Africa, and for a l'8in charge of one of the refuge lih tat country, and afterward served niber of the Concenitration Campe 'SIn. On ber return to Europe, at os!o the war, sbe tooli a speclal iSanltation at the College o! Physi- ',d urgeons in Dublin, and le there- el qalfed for the wurlt upon wblcb att-Synge wbo formed the r Reserve in Vancouver, on of Its kind in Canada. the Hon. Evellna Haver- leader o! the movemeut omen o! England for de- t of emergexicy, a nieve- ment wbich resulted in the forma- tion in that country o! the Wa- nxen's Volunteer Reserve, whieh now bas several thousand mem- bers. Mrs. Haverfield has also gene ta Serbia and le now work- ing in a hospital 'there. They are daugliters of the late Lord Abinger and descendents o! that General Scarlett wiho led the charge o! the Heavy Brigade at Balaclava On lier way acrose plhe con- tinent, Dr. Scarlett-Synge made short stops at Winnipeg and Mont- real for the purpose -o! assistlng in the formation o! Women'à Vol- unteer Reserves in those citles. At Winnipeg, she was one -o! the speakers at a great maes-meetlng lield feir the purpose o! stimulating recrultiug, at wblch six thousand persous were present. She is Vaking witb ber a large shipment o! hospitai supplies donated by Serbian sympathizers in Van- couvýer. Demanding Their Right to Serve ~s HEwomeno! this country T canhelp, and help enor- helP us tlirough ta victory. Wltb- out them vîctory will tarry, and vdctory whidli taýrries ineane vie- tory wbose footprints are the footprints o! blaod.\" Sa Mr. Lloyd George spoke to the bady o! 50,000 women wbo last month marched tlirougb the streets o! London, led by a white- clad figure bearlng the banner o! Britain-fi!ty tliousand women jolned in procession as a declara- tion ta the world o! their wllllng- ness, tibeir eagerness, theifl deter- mination ta serve their country. There was no order o! waman- liaad-blgh and low were repre- sented In their ranlis. A Princess walked witl Vliem, as dld a peerees and a prima donna. There were sbop girls, factory girls, and The figure that t~ womexl whose walrk iay In thelr the great parade homes. There were young girls, man strong and briglit cheeked, and aid women, trembling and Infirm. There were quffra- gettes and anti-suffragettes; women o! one political view, and women of another. But in the great essen- tial tihey were one. Every woman was a patriot. When the fiag bearlng the simple words, \"IWE DE- MAND THE RIGHT TO SERVE\" came Into view, DR. THE HON. EL1-A SCARLETT-SYNGE Of Vancouver, who bas Ieft for 8Orbia ta assist in the work of 1 the typhus scourge whioh has swept over that country and i thouand ofvictime. THE TRAGEDV 0F BELGIUM. ypified a mourning though unconquered Belgium in of women that took place in London recently, de. ding their right to serve their country. the epectators wtho iined the streets hailed it wlth a. cheer. A Pageant o! the Allies gave the picturesque side ta the great spectacle. France, Belgfum, Russia, Japan, Italy, Ser(bla, Mantenegra-eaci was repre- sented by a woman In natlonal drese. O! these, the niast s'triking and dramatic was the Ma- donna-like figure o! the woman wha typified Belgium, whose picture we publish on this page. The bondon Dally Chronicle descr\u003clbes bier In these words: \"It is with airnoet a sense a! sudden sbock that one cames upon an interval in a great marcb, an interruption and open space In a great army. It was in the midet a! sucli a space, in a solitude that seemed like a sience, that one saw the first desolate figure in the Pageant o! the Allies. She walked regally but sorrowfully, wltli an air o! proud humility. She was cladà In a long, tattered robe o! mournlng purple; ln lier bande she bore ala!t a torn and tat4ered fiag; and ber feet, notwitihstauding. tJhe'rain-swept streete, were humbly bare. Nevertbeless, she walked wltb f alth snd courage, ber liead and heart bigli wlth the hope o! toinorrow. She was the spirit anid symbol o! bereaved but un- braken Beigium.\" Odds and Endsof News Cuiiplhapter 1. O. D .,:of Club in its effort to make a huge suc- cees o! the Fete Day to take place in -the H. A. A. A. graunds on Sept. Stli. The Chapter w'lll contribute as its share o! thbe entertalument a pageant of 11Homage ta Beium from the Allieis.\" The Montreal Women's Mllltary and Rifle Association, wbose mem\u003cbersbip rose to two hundred and slxty Iu lees than a montli from. its organization, bas corne a cropper. Trouble !Ightlng began over a praposed change o! name and ,laimeci the question a! a woman colonel. Many of Its leadlng members have reslgned.",
         "THE COURIERt. Courierettes. a revival of polygamy in Europe, so IIINY FRD as bguna crn-that the popubation may be built \u003eup. HER PORaigegn agant glt--oy.Th We donVt sec It that way. Wc think more money you save on luxur- t-ho monf uoe th will so enom les like food t-le more you bave t-oe dfpecthtty lIhyro spend on necessities like gasoitne. polygamy. Natilonal Pluuibers' Association pro- Which ?-.4Coi. Roosevelt t-links t-le tests against t-be oid joke about United Stat-es may soon becomo Cliin- plumbers' bis. Tboy're rlgbt - a aied if lt does not wake up. T-here plumber's bill is, no jolie. ntho .-1,~ f.-\u002b the hcounmti Turkey soems t-o be a t-ough t-argot for t-he allies, but t-be Sicli Man was an easy mark for Germany. Georgia Legisiature enacts t-bat ne member sliall enter t-le chumber wbiie Intoxicat-ed. Quito appropriate, as Georgia la a dry stat-e. Jit-neys bave done one tbing-made t easier for t-be mot-orman t-o sce a prospective passeager. IMexIco lias been ralsing Cain sO long tbat It negiected t-o ralse corn, and now lis poople are st-arvlng. 'The Amerlean dollar -s now de- cl dt-o be worthb $1.0234, and Uncle Sam's foreign pollcy seems t-o ranli it above t-le value of t-be lives of some Americans. 'That Chicage convent-ion e! adver- tisons t-alked so mucb of their \"Trutbi\" slogan t-bat it reminded us o! Shako- mpeare's lady who protested t-oo mucli. Alfred Noyes, t-ho Englsh poot, was arrested In Boston, aft-er reading oit-e of his poems pu-bllely. Perbaps t-he policeman laekod lterary apprecia- tien. Unlike is predecessor, Secret-ary of State Lansing seems t-o bave a hobby for att-ending t-o business. That plowman wbo turn.ed up an old, can wlth $159 t-n It must be a booster for t-be 'back-to-t-be-farm meve- nient. t may not lie wt-se t-o sneer at San Marino, t-be ltttle republlc witb t-li army o! 900. Corsica. produced Na- poleon. The U. S. seenis t-o be bound t-o hold t-be record e! belng t-le biggost nieu-, t-rai niation on earth, anyway. A St. Louis policeman ion-vos t-he force te become a dentlot. Ho sbould know somet-hing about pull aayway. Treat-lng miay become treason la Britain. Will t-be offender be shot or just baîf-shot is now t-be momontous query. Tbey talli of thbe glft o! t-be gab- but it lsn't aiways a gift. Oit-en lt-' an -afflIction. It wouid lie Jut like a woman t-o want a set o! fars t-o matoh lier coat e! t-an. 11 u a A Good Idea.- There may not lie any war profit-s, so t migbt lie wise t-o tax t-ho war prephets. s'., bt The Roason.-Tbe tronches are ver- lt-abie healtth reoets, declares a Ger- mnan docter wbo bas been in tbom, Porbaps ho thinks so because o! t-be heavy charges made t-bore. uts ut'a Regarding Name.-The t-at-est mu- st-cal revue in Brtain le eait-ed \"Mûre.\" Wbat wlll t-ho next t-\u003e? \"Enougb\" or -Too Much\"? s' is A Song of Sorrow. I sowod some radisb seeds ln sprixtg, -I'm now Inclined t-o use words liad- disil; My radiabos are fulli o-f worms- Also the worms are full o! radisb. bt It Il Not Llkfty.-Therre b. folks vwho pred lot that after t-he war t-ber. will b. may lie Japanned. Whlch Explains lt.-We, see in t-h£ papers where a man bas just complet- ed half a eentury of service as engi- nser on the New York, New H-ayon, sud Hart-ford Ra.ilway. Some chape live a charmed lite. War Notes. 'Canada sent a dental corps to the front. Possly to fill up the gaps. The wooden cross and the double cross and the iron cross seem t-o be ail associated some- how. Yaqui Indians declared war against the Unitod ýStates and Germany. Can Uncle Sam ro- main neutrai I-n the face of that? Turks are said to be uising wooden shelis. But what will t-bey do w-Jen they have aIl lost their heads? 'Woodrow Wilson seems to be c o n d u c t-Lng a correspondence school in International law, with Kaiser WIlbelm as the dunce ln the olass. Turkey is more worrled over the .problem oM t-s war wIdows t-han o-ver t-bat of war babies. In his xiext noet- the Kaiser migbt tell Uncie Sam wbether ho proposes to lot Americans use the ocean for batlsIng. One of t-be humours oet-bis grim, war is t-o sees -the Balkans one of t-he few peaceful spots ln F\u003europe. À!t-er watcbing our neigbbors, te t-be soutb we are farced t-o thbe conclusion tbat war it-s one thing t-bat shouid lie taken out of poli- tics. Clever People. Muirooney t-s A clever chap; He underst-ands The weather map. -Youngstown Telegram, ~Mulrooney lias .Nothing on James; Ho caa pronaunce Those Poîleli namOs. -Sharon Herald. (MePadden is À chap more able; He undýerstands A IR. R. t-able. -Warren Tribune.' McGinnis goos 'ERm a-Il one bot-t-or; He understands A ca1?bureter. -Dtroit Free Pros. MoKenna Is The man we choose; Ho comprehends The war reviews. The Usual Thlng.-Newspaper vie tories continue t-o ont-buse t-be Germa people. The allies are aliways heinj crushed'-in t-be Tout-en press. Early Indications. -\"A great relig ious revival wvill le t-be resut of thbe war,\" says thle Bisliop of Du rham. Probably. We note in t-le financiai pages how consols are being con- verted. Looks Dark.-A bat-talion of coloreci men has been formed in Wales. More war clouds. Looks black for the foc. Described. - A Berlin journal de- scribes Woodrow Wilson as a man of straw. But pex-baps t-le st-raw lias been showing too plainly which. way thle wind is blowing. 0f Cou 'rse.-\"Wliy are your children like your religion?\" \"Because no kind is as good as your oWn.\" Too True.-In t-ho mIdst of a down- pour of ramn we are Led to reflect t-at there is one crop t-be weatlier can't spoil-the fool crop. Deflned.-Matrimony is t-he flery fur- nace o! love, and it takes pure goid t-o stand t-be test. Not So Easy. -John Wanamaker's idea of having thle United St-ateb scrapo t-oget-her ý$100,000,O00 and buy ~Belgium, t-o restoe it t-o t-he Bet-gans later, lias one or t-wo flaws ln IL- Whio is t-o givo t-ho t-t-le t-o t-be ravaged land? And, once bougbt, how is t-be U. S. go- ing t-o hoid It? Rlght Place.-If a man's home is t-o lie reckoned as t-he place where lie zieeps, many a -pions cbap would have t-o register from. t-ho charcbh. A Gaod ldez.-\"What are you going to linme your new boat?\" \"The Rumeur.\" \"Wliat's t-be Idea?\" \"Sbe's sure t-o stay afloat.\" What's Wrong With Jane?-Jafe Addams, of Chicago, formeriy reputed te be one of Amerlca's brainlest wo- men, came 'back front The Hague -poace conference to say t-bat she could net find eut wbe st-arted t-be war, and sho bhad found eut t-bat soldiers were dope'd ýwitb drink to give, t-ein t-he courage t-o charge. It seoms t-o us t-hat as a fander Jane Is a distinct £aillure. We know wlthout crosslng t-ho At-ian- tic wbat she falled to fnd, and we alse l\u003cnow t-bat wbat s-he says she found sbe must have droamed. Who carnies t-le keg before t-be charge ils made, anyway? The Style. Mary bougbl a bonnet, Se tiny, but se nice; The oaly iblg t-bing on t Was t-ho pnIce. Irish v. German.-Tbe Irisb Tommy, prisener, was feeling very wrotb wtt t-be destroyers e! Louvain, whon a Germnan officor dashed by on what -Paddy termed \"a rare -bit o! borse- flesb? \"Faitb! t-hat's an Irish herse,\" sald 'Paddy, and -ht-s eyes glinted malt-clous- t-y at t-be Touton-c soldier, who liad a fat-r knowt-odge o! Engt-el, ami at once tooli up t-be glove. Tliey wouid prola- -bt-y bave come t-o blairs, ln spite of Paddy's precarlous position, had not a Scompatriot of bt-s proposed t-bat who- ever could t-ell thbe ýbiggeat lie migit dlaim t-ho horse for bis country. Paddy fart-butb began a t-aie wbt-ob was one lie fren 'beglnning t-o end, and stop- ped trlumphrwntly. Thon lis Teutenie opponent began, la slow, but correct, Bnglish: '1Ther(e. was once a German gentte- man-\" \"That sett-les tt,' said (Paddy, wth a sigb of resIgnation; \"t-be horse la a German o-no!\" nl A real delight for break fa Fi a Canteloupe with TOA-STED (1 c per Package Cut canteloupe In hall; cdean eut cet Ii with Corn Flahe,, addins a littie W te suit the test. ToArED Made ÇORN LARin Canada -ROYAL. VICTORI COLLEGE MOINTRAL THIE RESIDENTIAL COLLEI FOR WOMEN STtJDENTS McGILL UJNIVERSITY Students (loth reaident day) prepared for degrees Arts, Pure Science and MUS~ Scholarships are awarded i nually. For Prospectus and formation aipply te t-be Wardf buildingr-J. 7situation,w- ing fields. Dr School te liousehold i__on -càILMDAnR ýY TO A Christian college-hoi -healthful situation. For prosectus and teraus,wTitethe A Word for Uncle Sam(.--Old Uncle Sam ýmay not bie ready fer war, but ho e\u0026.,â write diplomat- ie notes wtth ýany other nation on oartb, by bock! 11ýý1",
         "THE COUIER. Our Wonderful British Airmen What the Royal Flving Corps Means te the British Armu 5! advent of the aeroplane and ýJhe dirigible bailoon has changed the whole course o! modern war- Anl armay is no0 longer able to n' its movements; the day o! the ise attack is lost in1 the memory It campaigns. Reconnaissance is lie! duty o! the airman of to-day. ru engineering bias provided us machines capable of dropping 011n the enemy's troops and forti- )ns, 'but sucli measures are of dary importance. Our airmen 1,a eyes of the army.\" The air enlables a Commander-in-Chief ýertain the Position and strength enlemy within a range o! a hun- MTilles in less'than four hours. 11g can be hidden froni an oppos. Irce. dutY O! the scout is, of course, )fextreme danger; higli-angle ris flow able to huri a shei feet into the air; they burst be- Ils machine; it. may be that Ie! bullets reacli the airman hlm- But in order to make an accurate laissance, the pilot, unless he be *Panied by a passenger, must not le a man of iinbounded courage, 'St aise %be a clever strateglat. the great heiglit at whici lie 3 nmasses of troops appear as after the Franco-Prussian War that rnilitary ýballooning was introduced into the army and a school opened near Chatham. A few years later a balloon section accompanied our expedition to Egypt, When its work proved o! great service to the forces engaged. The valuable assistance rendered by our captive balloons at the tume o! the Boer War is stili fresh in our memories. Time and again our aerial observers disclosed the enemy's posi- tions and intentions, and though they were constantly fired at they often re- mained afloat for several days at a stretch. But the coming o! the aeroplane created a new situation in mulitary aeronautics. In 1904 the bailoon sec- tion was removed to Aldershot, where experiments were conducted untîl 1911, when the Army Air Battallon sprang Into existence largely owing to the efforts of Sir Alexander Banner- man. The great strides ia aviation made in France at the tume created a profound impression ln this country. Army officers were eager to learn to fly, and many did so at their own ex- pense. But the Army Air Battalion did not continue to control. mulitary aviation for very long. In 1912 the Royal Fly- SCHMIDT THE SPY \u003erder te avoid capture they are now taklng London down and 9 it toa ome secret destination.\" Engîlali people do mucli joking about the German spies. This is 1 cartoon in, a series. whicli las been very popular. Drawn by ,eete for \"ýLodon Opinion.\"] ll\u003cs, ail sense et colour lias MI he o'bjects on the eartli, these exceptionaî clrcun- Seldom baffle 'the 'skilled Il Frenchi paid a glowlng tri- le sk11! c! Britishi airmen lu days of the war, when lie Phey have furnlahed me wlth COniplete and accurate Infor- lich lias ýbeen of incalculable he Conduct oft he operations. i0n1stantly by frlend and tee, hesitatlng te fiy ln al they liave remalned un- lirouglicut.\" Surprise of the War. People were umaware betore Oktbreak of war of the won- .Nil state of effIicency whIch Flylng Corps liad attained. ilaglueti that we were far lier Powers lu til respect, Irinen have since proveti ldancy over thicse fct he d their skill at least equals [È Allies. aeronauties was taken Up int l tis country. It Is lng Corps was instituted, when both naval and mllltary -Wîngs were estab- llslied. Only a few monthe befere the outbreak o! war the nav 'al wlng re- lleved the mlltary wlng o! the work connected wlth the dîrigile ýballoon section. Our dirigibles are lntended, te ce- operate wlth the Fleet, and It la preb- ably largely due to the fact that the mlltary wlng was relleved of this work fliat It was enabled te attain sucli a state et efflclenry In the few Inenths wich Dreceded the war. Brit- ain la exceptlonally well provlded wlth service iiylng grounds and achools. Tlie naval school Is ah Easthurcli, and tiere la a mullhary training establisli- ment at .ldershot. Bullet-Proof Armour. QINCE the outbreak of war the mil!- a.) tary wlng of the Royal Flylng Corps in France lias been under the direction of Brigadierooneral Sir David Henderson. No transports were required te conduch our airmen te Flanders; they accompllsied the jour- ney by air, and that wltlieut a single casualty. The Governmnent lias up te thie presont adopted ne speclal type et machine. The best BiItishi and Frenchi makes are being used by eur pilots. The air scout requmes the moat trust- THE INDEPENDENT ORDER 0F FORESTERS FURNISHES A COMPLETE SYSTEM 0F INSURANCE Policles Issued by the Society are for the protection of your family, and cannot be bought, sold, or pledged. Benefits are payable to the Beneflciary in case of death, or to the member ln case of hie total disabiiity, or to the member on attainlng seventy years of age. Policies lssued from $500 to $5,000. TOTAL BENEFITS PAID, 42 MILLION DOLLARS. For further Information and literature apply to FRED J. DARCH, S.S. Temple Building E. G. STEVENSON, S.C.R. -TORONTO. H THE B A K F RINL 18594 HOME ANK CANADA * BRANCHES AND CONNECTIONS THROUGHOUT CANADA I JAMES MASON, General ManagerI * HEAD OFFICE AND NINE BRANCHES IN TORONTO * Head Office--jO King Street West - Toronto Branch *79 Church Street Cor. Bloor West and Bathurst Cor. Queen East and Ontarlo 1871 Dundas St., Cor. HIgh Park Ave. 1220 Vonge Street (Subway) Cor. Alcorn Av. 2261 onge Street, North Toronto, Cor. Eglinton Ave. CAM ~c Ilx A--»\"'TB-,Lr I-XfIEITI0t4 SSchools and Coll1eges ONTARIOU LADIES' COLLEGE and ConservatoËy of Music and Art WHITBY, ONT. Offers Uneq»Uaed Adysatge for the Training of Youw Daught.r. TrwentY-eight miles from Toronto, 1N) acres of grounds, beautiful gardeus, ten- nia courts, larg ~ nasium and swlm- Ming pool. Tuiniversaity graduateag instruction ln Academic and Husehol ScienZdc epartments; facilities for Mus- ca dation of the highest order \u003caffil- iatedwith TorontoCouservqtoryofMusic. Ân Intellectuel, physical, spiritual and Social environnient wlaich makes for deveiopmenî of the highest type of strong, capable, Christian wonaahood. Coilege re-opens September 8th. Write for Caendar te Rev. F. 1- Fairewell, B.\u0026., prilcipat 'I SAINT ANDREW'S CO LLEG TORONTO - - ONi ARESIDENTIAL and DAY SCHOOL for Beys. Upper and Lower Scheels. Beys Prepared for Matriculatien inte the Universities, for entrance into the Royal Military Cellege, and for 0 Business. Calendar centaining fui! particulars sent on application. 1EV. D. BRUCE MACDONALD\u003e M.A., LL.D.. H.admattoe AUTUMN TERIIL CO VÎMENCES SEPT. 13th, 1915 'i M r1 e i N e FX.d TORONTO [EPT. 28 The Fair of ail Fairs 13i MAGNIFICENT WAR SPECTACLE \"March of the Allies \" ' \" Review of the Fleet\" Remarkable Exhibit of War Trophies; Model Military Camp of men tralnlng for Overseas: aeroplane fllghts; -glant new m Idway; gorgeons fire- works; mammoth exhIbIt of agricultural products and manufactures. Another million year. Corne wlth the crowds. WES TROURNE Sclaool for Girls 278 DIo.r Street W.ag TORON TO, CANADA A reideutilan sd \"ay school- smail enough te enafure for the. Dupils a roai borne, careful ver- sonal training and tliouxhtful supervion. Pupila prepared for the TUniversity. Ciass instruction la IroIk and Aeathetie Danin a wonl asl physicai work Outdoor $ports. Amfllated wlth the. To- ronto Conaerva.torY of Music- . McGiflivary Knowlea. \u0026.C.A., Art Director. Sohool reopens September ldtb. For Cabaudar addreau the, Prin-, cipal, Mia. IL Curiette, E.",
         "THlE COURIER. THE CANADIAN BANK 0F COMMERCE SIR, EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O., LL.D., D.C.L., President. ALEXANDER LAIRD, General Manager. JOHN AIRD, Ass't. General Manager. CA.P.lmTAKL, $151OOOOOO RESERVE FUND, $13,500,OOO SAVINUc3S BANK ACCOUNTS Interest at the current rate is; allowed on ail deposits of $1.00 and upwards. Careful attention is given to every account. Small accounts are welcomed. Accounts mnay be opened and operated by mail. Accounts anay be opened ln the namnes of two or more persons, withdrawals to be made by any one of them or by the survivor. DEBENTURES 0F G ovt. Prov. Ontario and, City -of Toronto Those having money availabl. and t. wlomoî sfety in inveatment is the firat and paramount consideration cannot do botter than select th. beat »governm.ent and municipal securitiea. Pull particularis on requcat A. E. AMES \u0026 CO* Union Sonk Bumilding, Toronto itablishcd Bankra(Cor. Bay \u0026 Kins St».) 1889 The Prudent, Investor j n quires, rightly, about thé precautions taken in dealing wyith w hs funids by the institution to which he entrusts them.I To describe such precautions, we have published our Book- let, 'Guaranteed Trust lnvestMents,\" ;hich tells how we mnvest clients' moneys in first mortgages on improved real estate on our Guaranteed Trust lnvestment plan. We\" are glad to ~mail copies of thii bookiet on request B VCapital Paid-up, Reserve, I $1.500.000., $1.500.000. I 18-22 KiNO STREETEATaRToO. POPULAR!e COSGRAVES Mild (Chili-Proof) Pale Aie If yoîu have been drinking other beers it is be- cause you have neyer tasted Cosgraves. Order a case so you and your friends aen joy it. For over haif a Century the Cosgrave label lias meant the hest in hop and malt beverages. 84-Q worthy and reliable machiine which science can lavent. lI-e may have to remain over the eneiny's Unes for hours at a time, and though our motors bave not yet attaiaed perfection, yet it says munch for the machine employed that so few have fallen Into the hands o! the enemy. ýMany of the scouting aad nîl o! our fighting aeroplanes are provided with bullet-proof armour, tbe latter types being armed witb mitraillieuses for attackiag hostile aircraft. These ma- chines are fitted with every device for dropping bombs, darta, or arrows, and not a few of the scouting types are equipped with a wireless Installation, -capable of transmitting a message a distance o! thirty miles. The great In- crease ln the capacity of the petrol tanks attached to the modemn aero- plane lias materially onhanced Its sphere of use!ulaess in war. Many of our machines can store sufficlent potrol for a journey of five bundred miles, and they are able to rise bigh above the ground in a distance of fifty yards. The equipment which accom- paies our air squadroas In France ls enormous. Bach o! the squadroas In the field is accompanied 'by a coin- plete train, comprising sometblng like frfty units. These vohlicles include aeroplane tenders, baggage waggons, repairing vans, and a whole train of lorries laden with spare parts. An aeropiane may seema a difficult engine of war to transport, but our latest niodels may be dismaatled In a few minutes, sO that thelr width, when on a tender, ls little more than seven feet. T1he work of the naval wing of the Royal Flying Corps bas to some ex- tent been rathler ecllpsed, by the ing deeds of our airmen ln Fia The Admiralty, doubtless for tih of reasons, has refrained frain1 us much about the North Se scouts. We know that Our soa facilitated the action of the Fleet in the Dardanelles, botb III ing the fire of the warships el and In locating submarine mine when the history of the war O0M be written we shail hear a gre, about the men who, in fair w and foui, have maintained a cc vigilance over the North Sea, i1 ing for enemy ships and helP keep the seas clear for Britai lier Allies. In the sphere of a the work of our hydro-aeropla1l been largely supplIemented Il Dirigible Balloon Section of the Flying Corps. The principal t dirigible employed by the Adi is the Astra-Torres, a small.sell airship. Since the opening of hostillti Naval airships have been ûOUl cruising over the North Sea, f observations which the se\u003c owing to !ts llmited sp'here Of could not possibly perforai. dangers to be encouatered On1 voyages and the woaderful sP the crews was aptly shown by tih dent wbich occurred to one of () slips last autuman. The captaini dIrigibie feared that It wouldl be sary to descend In order to ref broken propeller blade, but tWO crew volunteered to perform the tion in mid-air, and ciimbing Oi the stays, fittod a new blade height of 2,000 feet above the se War Boosts Prosperity-Pro Tet English People Rccently \"Hand-o-mouth» Now in Luxury By' BASIL M ANCHI-ISTER CITY ls thouglit to lie bard bit by tbe war. So it Ia ln one way. The thousands of foreign agents, shippers, buyers, sales- men, and others, middlemen through whom ManchesIterle cotton aad îron and steel la the peace days reaehed the farthest ends o! the world, sit aow alinost alone ln their little offices. For the trade o! Manchester needs but few middlemen now. Thiere Is ln the, main but one gres.t consumer to be reacbed-the fghtilag man and bis guns-aad a Goverament or two are all the mIddlefmen necessary to put Manchester milse and works in toueh with the tronches. Yet what a trado this Manchester war trade ls! Cinyton, Gorton, Traf- ford Park, and etheýr Manchester sulbuilbs3 are \u003cblack with the snoke of It. The nWglts are alive wiVh the liglits and runible and the banner- lngs of It. Every available man, wo- man, and cbuld Is at work on ItL Aad the Laibour Excbanges' window cards still apfeal pitoously ln pIil and blue and white and red for yet rmore of theni. There are no more. There is one old laibourer at a re- pIr hbop near Gorton wbo trudges slowly ln at bis yard gates at 7 'p.m. every niglit, bis supper ln a basin tied ln a red handkerchlef. Hoe comes out at six o'elock Ia the momning, bavinz durlng the aiglit had hie supper and thon hli an bour'a nap) under the red handlkerchief. His former waga, wheniever lie could find work-whlch was flot o!ten, poor old soul-was 1er. a week; bis wage now Is 17s. 6d. a nigiit! Re works alongslde younger M- meiWho aro maklng £8 a week and mnore--mea who ln the past earned 50S. There le a b1g woxrks on the banlis of Manchester's River Irwell where they are makiag copper bands. I was told that earnlngs b\u003eers were on the average three times more than ln nor- mal tines. At the big armamoent firms a week's earnlngs o! £7 liy men wbo till now have never earned £3 are qulte common, and mien o! speclal Bkill are drawing £$1 and £14 for a week's work. The clothing makers of Manchester are paying out snch wo.ges as were neyer known in the trade liefo\u003cre. A girl who was machlniîig briglit red trouser 4braces for the tirqops o! Borne nation ti me wlthout tptopp~in in CLARKE ber work that she and lier si talion home for the previou; work 67s., which was more t. had ever earned In their live bier normal earnings -being aib Thore are girls earning 20s. week la sboii maklng who ne' away from home before. The the muet part daughters of! 1 in the saine works-a colosE witb severai thousan-d manOf- contribution fromn thoni te th Income is quite an exceaption due not so much to a ne money as to a wish to do \"wa More girls la Manclost, learned ln a fow weeks the maklng cartridge beits for guns, aadi are earning their more a week. Ia the case worin~ig tamllos, liheso eX ýarily lncreasod oaralngs al tional eamniags xmay mount uP marklble figure. The eârnings o! the old cotton miii famlieE, cashire, who found £10 a weE ail an unustuai family income- they lived in a cottage rente ed. a week-are quite eciP\u003e now la the war contractes u Manchester. There is one dorton !amIlY'J revenue aceount, which cal very oxceptional either la tSal or la otlier lroaworks areas: E'ather, a fitter........ .... 2 Son, a fitter .................£7 Son, a collier ..............La Daugliter, a machinlst ...£1 Daughter, apprentice to dresmraking......... £ Total famlly income...£19 Rent of house ........... 8.9.34 le there savlng? There lB, noearly enougli, seeing the 1111' ture of this \"war prosperity\" bard times that musat con'\u003e father is paylng 10s. and the 1 5s. a week oach to war loan; t the usuai \"'elulb\" snonoy siibso o! a fow shillings a week. AP that, the moneY wlVh this ta wlth many otbor Manchester la really leaking a.way. The sons i\u003euy new ciothe0 I bicyes, the daughýter pure goid ring for lier soldier lad 11 there is the gift o! a new es",
         "THE COURIER. MONEY AND 5 MAGNATL5 The Hazvest of 1 91 5' DESPITE excessive tains in certain Parts of Ontario, and despite the fact that Canada bas flot bad as mucli sunshýine as was desirable, the Canadian harvest of 119115 promises well. Last week cbronicledi a considerable improvement ail over the country, witb the exception, of the district around Toronto, wbere a windstorm levelled about forty per cent. of wbeat, oats, and ;corn. hiarvest dates In the West advanced about five days. A business man who toured the West recentry described the situation of the past montb by snylng that Canada was standing on the edge of a precipice. Good weather, with plenty of sunshine, meant a 'bumper harvest; bad weathcr meant a harvest without profit. Since fris report was made the weather bas ,been almost ideaL, Wliether a new record in agricultural production will bie marked up remains undecided. What is .practically !certain at the moment is that the harvest w AI be greater than last year. Given ordinary luck lI the next four weeks, the increase will be about twenty-rlve per cent. The improved prospects are shown ini the wbeat quotations, which ýare steadîly falling, and in improved -business conditions everywhere. The onily danger not yet averted is a shortage of ships Vo carry 'Canada's exports to Liver- pool. *Sir Robert 'Borden bas taken up this matter witb the British authorities, who bave more Vlan a baîf interest in tbe situation, and undoubtedly something will be done. \"ýBETTER TIMES\" are close at band. Profits of Bread BREAD ls a staple, and people migst buy it in bad times as well as good. It ia the last item Jn the househcolder's expense to be cut down for economy salie. Therefore, bread-making should be a profitable business wben the management la sound. The day of the smnall1 baker bas gone, so far as the large cities are con- cerned. This is the era of tbe big bread company, thie 'big milli company, tile big meat company. ln these commodities thle cost of dellvery is a large Item, and thle big company delivering Vo, tenl bouses on a street, instead of one or two, lias a supreme ýadvantage. The Canada Bread Company, wltb Its head office in Toronto, la one of thle largest, If flot the largest,l'n Canada. Its capitalization is as follows: First mortgage bonds .......... $1,1209,000 paying 6 per cent. Preferred sock ............... j2,50,000 paying 7 per cent. Common stock ................ 2A00,000 paying -- per cent. Total ....................$4,659,000 During Vthe year closlng June 20U, 191ý5, til oompany earned enougil to pay intereet on bonds -and preference stock and leave a Ibalance of $140,000. This is computed after provldlng for ail repa.lrs and maintenance, but allows nothIng for depreciation. Thle latter item will sot be large, If repaît s are well kept up, which tbey seem to be. The company ltself sems to think $50,000 suffIieent for the, year, and this leaves a surplus of $88,990, or more than three per cent, on th.e common stock, wich la nomlnally quoted [n Vthe exchasges at $30 a share. As tile surplus last year was $56,{00, the preference stock can be ILighly ,recommended as an lnvestment. At Its present selllng price of 90, It wIll yîeld nearly elgbt per cent., This 1Is the Day of Steel Stocks A ONSIDJDR4ABLE portion ef the Investing public bas awakened to the fact that thls 15 the day of steel stocks. :'Bethlehem Steel, Mr. Scbwab's com- pany, bas, big war ordere, and the shsares have risen from $40 to $300. The profits of this company on its war orders .n Vile Vwelve montils are expected Vo be suffIcient Vo, pay a 25 per cent. divldend for four years. If Vile war silould last througil 1916, the company would have an enormous -cash surplus. 'The story of Bethlehem ls the story of ail steel-worklng companles that are ge'tting orders for munitions of war. Eu.rOPe's necessities are Amerîca'e oppor. tunities. United 'States Steel, ýw'th a capitalization of $500,000,000, la gettlng Its portion. Thle stock has advanced about $30 a share, or a total gain in market value of $150,000,000. Tila i an enormfolis rise, and means buge Profits for speculators who went In at the bottom and got out at the top. It means pleasant thougilts for Investors who bouglit the stock before Its recent rise, even Vboughl they do not intend to soul. So In Canada tile Dominion Iron and Steel Company, Vile Noya Scotla Steel and Coal Company, Canada Car and Pouiidry 1Company, National Steel Car, Steel Company of Canada, and otiler large concerna are getting big orders and are probably maklng large profits. Some Of these concerna were in arrears la divi- dende on tileir preferred stocks, aud owed thle banks large balances. The latter are belng pald off dirst. TIen will corne declaration o! accrued dlvidends. Tilen wlll follow an accumulation of profits and dividends on the common stocks. There le no guarantee tlat\u003e ail til wlll be accompMied. 'Neverilelese thle prospects are good. The wal, seems llkelY to drag on for anotiler .year at lest, perilape two years. Orders are stIli beig pl'aced by Europeau countries, and ail the factorles are working night and daY. Belles the speculation ln the stock markiet, wilere prospects are alweays dlscouRted. Canadian Car and Fouindry Company stock bas rîsen above par. In thîs case tile prospecte are excellent, because Seunator 'Curry bas been lucky in securIng large catracta fromi Rusia. Nova SgeotiaSteel le almoet as certain Vo show large profit. Just bow far Dominion Steel will benefit le not so clear, but its mille are busy. National Steel Car of Hamilton le sald Vo have more orders than It can fill Iteel!, and le bavtng some work dose by thle Otls4'Fensom Com- pany and ýSawyer-Maesey. Hleuce tile ra.pld rise la Vile quotatione for bathl pre- ferred and COMMon stocke of al tilese coflpanles. No one dreamed a year ago tilat Canada Car oommon would be quoted aý' 106, Doi4nion .Steel common at 40, Steel of 'Canada et 30, National'Steel Car at 50, Canada Locomotive at 54, Nova Scotia Steel at 95, and so on tilrough Vile l1eV. Thle average rise ia Vie co3nmon stock of ahl tilese companles la over $20 a sbare, wicil means 'consideable profit for aomebody. That Vileie wilI be a furtiler rîse o! $20 a ailare seeme qulte witilin the range of possillty._ WbIle tile epeculators are making mon\u003eey ln thle common stocks 0f tie steel compaules, the wlee inveetor wll pay more attention to Vile preferred stocke. Tilere wIll be lese Immediate profit for the amount Invested, but tilere le also, lese risk. il F H TAVE a bottle AAwaling for you. Af ter the day's work, enjoy O'Keefe's \"Pil- sener\" Lager. It wiIl take ail the tiredness away., \"'nthe Light Beer in The Light Bl'o/\" is concentrated vigor and refreshment. It is the ideal food-tonic, strength- giver and reviver.. Keep it in the bouse. ORDER A CASE FROM YOUR DEALER. 3w Cawtha Mulock \u0026 Co. Nimbera of Tfrmte Stock Exchu1. Brokers And Bankers 12 KING STREET EAST TORONTO, CANADA CauL AIDKRUS--CAWLOCE TOROMT A Lett« ies a aiAp- ALetar pearance counts ÀC.rd for a Èood deal ln o u r Intercourse. A Word A sloVenly letter, a eolled Oal Procal a cador a C Gentleman or betray lgnorse l -GenltleWOMa gentlea rgn known by their particular atn- tien to all these thinga. Let us \u003ehelP you to use words 'with cars and difcrimifnaton. \"A Desk 1Book of Errors In English- la just the lIttle book to help you In uslng the rlght word at the rlght Urne and r1ght place. A very hanfdy and very dire-ct Uittle book. By F'rank I. Vizeteliy. l2mo, eloth, $1.00 post-pald. UNIVERSITY BOOK CO. 8 University Ave. :Toronto",
         "THE COURIER. WH11 Y? Why does the Circulation Manager of the Courier appeal for' ,assistance in extending the circulation of this journal in W e Stern Canada? 1. Because Canada is a big, broad country, a land of magnificent dis- tances, and a national paper must have -agents everywhere. Two or three travelling salesmen cannot do the work. 2. Because there is a demand for the only. illustrated weekly in every city and town in Canada. 3. Because the Courier is the only non - partisan, illustrated weekly which is read in every city and town in the Dominion. 4. Because the Courier has the largest circle of readers of any weekly or monthly in the country and needs agents everywhere to look after its customers. 5. Because the Circulation Manager is ambitious to have more readers for a paper which he knows will benefit and interest every home in which it enters. Write to-day for particulars. You can make an annual income of one to three hundred dollars a year in your spare time. ADDRESS: CIRCULATION MANAGER, CANADIAN COURIER, 181 SIMCOE ST., TORONTO FIGURES ON POPULATION AND RESOIJRCES FAVOUR THE ALLIES MR. P. W. WILSON, in the London Dally News and Leader, in foJ shadowing the inevitable outcome of the war, directs attention the population and resources of the belligerents, as follows: Nation. Population. nesource, British Empire ....................... 439,000,000 $2,245,000,0 Russia.............................. 174,000,000 1,700,000,0 France (witli colonies) .................80,000,000 1,100,000,0 Italy............................ ... 38,000,000 565,000,0 Japan .............................. 53,000,000 325,000,0 Belgium \u003cincluding Congo) ..............7,500,000 (unstate Servia............................... 3,000,000 42,500,0 Montenegro............................ 500,000 2,500,0 Total .......................... 795,000,000 $5,980,000,0 Against these forces and resources are aligneti: Nation. Population. Resïourcef Gerrnany............................ 65,000,000 $875,000,01 Austria .............................. 29,000,000 700,000,0' Hungary ............................. 21,000,000 470,000,0 Turkey .............................. 21,000,000 85,000,0 Total .......................... 136,000,000 $2,130,000,0 Mr. Wilson's conclusions are that the figures ýgiven sumn up only 01 result, and that is final, overwhelming triumph of the Allies. The Awakening of Alden \u003c.uoncIuaed \"France! Wliat's France to Alden?\" The mllking was not finishedti tat niglit, and the Mayor's cow lowed piti- !ullY in the morning. For the Mayor read now the greatest lettor that lad ever corne to Alden, not excepting jot- ters from Mombers o! Parliament or Postmasters-General or Prime Minis- ters of Province or Dominion. \"Doar Sir,--I have been cliargeq to $end this information to you aud to ask you to make it known to the parties concerned. Four brothers by thxe name of Erlan fromn your town were killed i n the rocent figliting at St. Julien, under pecullarly note- wortliy circumstances. Teleplione communications liaving been severeti with ian advanced trench, orders to the commander o! that section of tho Canadian lime liat to lie carrieti by lianti. The fIrst man, known to lis !ellows as bEuttering Erlan, got only fortY Yards across the.open wlien le met lis fate. The.second and third brothers faled in the saine way. The message was finally carrieti across by the fourtli, a former circus worker, whose first naine 1 arn unable te, obtain. But hie was wounded la the ativance trench and left behinti, by mistake, wlien the occupants witlidrew. It was thon that a fIlfth townsman of yours, Lieutenant Phippen, went forward un- deor the liottest o! firé and by a miracle was able to, drag the Erlan man lback tb OUT limes. Both men have Just tibet hore in this hospiral. 1 have the lion- our to, e0mmunicate to you the pralse o!f very higli officers for the lierolsma ehO'wxi, lYyour fellow towusimen. Thero eau lie at least one coimfort to those lIm- medlately bereaved; anti it lies iu the inanner of the deat\u003eh of tbese menl.\" The MaYor's banda trernbloti as lie roati and lis 'wi!e, roating over lis shoulder, wept into lier bine apox. \"Ilzzle,\" lie salid, \"Who's to telli t?\" \"You,\" siho salid. \"You got to tell The old mayor straightenied lis shoulders and puseet the milklng stooi fromn under bis feot. He 'went into 1h15 bouse andi dressed lai lis bilack, coat and a white shirt, witliout a collar. He hati forgotten the collar. With slow steps andi haltlug accents le tolti first the doctor, tlien the widow, and then, remomboxing some- thlng, lie wiyhlperot iIt to the Hoover girl, wlio was runnlng 6nales on tlie dlhurch organ preparatory to choir ýpractice. There 'was no choir prac- bice that niglit, but the next night thero was a prayor meeting to whilb, by sipeclal orders from thie Reverenti Jones, everyibody but tbe slck came. There the news was fiually publishoti and the letter rend. For bhe first filme lu many anonths Jones falotito pray for Peace. It was a fighting soer- mon. .Alden Ihati been robboti. :So whon 1 corne te 4itien expectlng ponce I find a changeti village. The faces on the street are diliferent ln expression. The bopies of conversa- tion on the post office seps or at the gate o! the chuirch or lu thle cerne- tory wliere thie people wà4lk softly from Page 7.) back and forth plucking liere there a wisp of the luxuriant tliii Vliat rus ties over the graves-are ferent. The doctor lias'grown 01 a niglit and lIs selling out bis J tice. :The Hoover girl lias a strý sadness albout ber face and yet a, of radiance as though somethiflg matie heýr unaccountably prouti. is to lie a nurse andi to go to front Tlie Widow Erlan, she of onion sets, lias clhanged more any. 'She used* to be an apolit sort of woman. Mer sons 'were a ted to have been rolling stonies 'wasters. Tliey liat deserteti lier ' tliey should have remnained to\u003e lier. Tliey lad shovwn neitlier gence, thrif t nor enterprise. But the Is alinost arrogant. \"Goýod,\" slhe 'whispered, wlien Mayor told lier.\" \"Gooti!\" The Mayor could only stare arnazeinent. \"I saY 'Goodl\"# saiti the 'wl( stlll starlug far aheati of lier. ,cause I miglit have dieti thilldr lad !brought nothing more lntL world than Idle mon-andi 1 5111 have been wrong. War lias madie ricli whlle it lias roblioti me. MY and bis son.\" notdug toward the o! the 'town 'where the Phippefl gery lay, \"have brouglit sornethi11 tlis town that pence could neyer Abrouglit. There wvill not be a lrnorn 'here b\u003eut 'will lie more the for lkuowing five sons o! Aider, at Langemarck.» Tlien she wept. flut wliat the witiow saiti was t anti the Mayor, who seils toXIbstc as a sîde-liue to the ýchop TXiIll given a great \u0026narble sliaft finer~ e than the one lbought hy the Brownlees wlien their father died, lit 'lias been set up in the mild the plece o! grass wbere the 1 coming through the tc'wn, turi elther sido o! the road. The nanie:' five mou are engraveti thereon. there le room for more, for 'wit second andi wlth thle thîrd conitf merore men have enllsted froin than Alden dreszned l had. have corne in from farms round too. Alden is awalce and vigilant- Close at kfanc\u0026-A woman fro01 Southi visltilng New York for the0 time was much agitated wliel, 8 belng conveyeti through the l' tube, she found herse1f in anotbfile way. Rushlng Up to a knowlig-l lug intividual, she asketi, in an~ tateti toue: \"8fr, do please tell me wliere la York?\" \"Lady,\" salid lie, witli the Utn gravity, \"lt's riglit at the top of t stalrs.\"-Harper's Magazine. Far AfieId.-\"HI-e cornes front~ a 9 famly.\" \"Weàl, lie must lie a Long wa t Horne.»-Llfe.",
         "THE COURIER. S ac r ifiïce 0of E n id 1APTER XVII.- (Continued) ~1OU mnust know that I have liad, and StUR have, mucli ta see to. This le a mat- ter of the most serions tance, and I was obliged to see redale.\"1 d you have been spending your vith her? I don't seem to care s Imucli as I did. I don't know care about anytbing much aid looked at him and saw that 'e hall a sunken appearance. _i are i11!\" he said. P'u not. But I'm flot well, and thin-k I ever shall be.\" fig abroad niay set you up.\"1 Ifi fot abroad yet. I daresay get me at the last.\" ave been listening to the story r wonderful escape. Not one er in ten thousand manages to te. Wbat did you do with your 115 clothes?\"l )Id the labourer to hide tliem, ]ru them one by one wben he 10 so safely. For bis own sake en't speak, besides the fact that :redae promised hlm so mucli But lie earned it, for the in the parcel was intact, and cycle was in firet-rate condi- lie penalty then so heavy for ring or hiding a prisoner ?\" tawfully heavy. You and Miss are rnnlng fearful rieke.\"1 ~do you allow ber to mun aeked Ronald with indigna- Waills lauglied. \"Don't yon hat she would be far more un- if she didn't mun them? That s0 fond of me that she would Lblng to lie wltli me.\" 10'ç -that she ls a very noble \" Rônald replled sliortly. woMen are fond of mne.\"' Id went out of the rooni; this lied bis patience almost be. idurance. If ever there were a litterly and entirely tbrown 111 a man lie thougbt It was edale on Cornwallis. dinner the latter comp lained 1g tfred. flot go to bed?\" said Ronald. go out on business.\" 'Will; it le very duil alone.\" d made bis way at once to a wbose nitae lie bad seen print- door, a practitioner wbo lie WOuild be somnewliat low down tocial ecale., 31 lie inquired the penalty, (if ere any), for biding and abet- Olivict ta escape, and was bor- learn bow beavy this was. lits fee and departed, a tumnît lnd. 1,a man wliose lfe liad \u0026i- enabove suspicion, to mun the llflprisoniment for a long term salie of an unprlnclpled man? 'Ould bis father say if thie Pass, and as to bis mother, it reak ber beart. lie knew that lie was acting Ifile of no man, but for Mary r love o! a wanian, and lie me- 0 go on. She did not know IXtent of their rieli, elie sliould IOW. But if there were the etween bîm and lier of being ided it sliould be bis, lie Ldeld ber in every way pas- CHA.PTER XVIII. Danger. 11D fennd hlmself on the Hoe. eas late, thangli not yet dark. 'Orgs of people were lletenlng 1 lit the west end, but the easta quiet. H1e looked wltb inter- le aid Eddystone liglithouse, Ils rernoved some years aga, ion the Hoe. A tail, sailor-a 11man accosted lim. 11 Wlsl to see the llghtliouse, %VYou, I sliould lîke to do so,\" 81df, Wo was glad to End an t 'Olfi harasslng thouglit. I tWr the usual time, but I amn s ake, i 'wlll open it for yen.\" 111eans a sillng,\" tiiouglt t an it will le a shilling weli t B y MRS. HARCOURT-ROE Author of \"A Man of Myster,\" \"The Silent Roon,.\" Etc. H1e inspected minutely the variaus little round roomst, the kitchen, the~ sleeping apartment, the lantern, and expressed himIself interested in ail. \"Do you ever bave visitors at the real Eddystone?\" lie asked, \"for the life must be lonely.\" \"Plenty of visitors.\"1 \"To sleep?\" For lie had an idea that lie sbould lîke to spend a niglit in this lanely seagîrt spot. \"Oh, no, sir, not ta sleep. It wauldn't be allawed unlese necessary.\"I As Ronald was leaving the Hoe be met Hazelfoot. \"Wbhy, dear me!\" exclaimed that Young officer, \"who'd have thouglit of. seeing you? Corne bacli witb me, won't you ?\" \"I can't to-niglit. But I thauglit you lîved on board a torpedo destroyer.\"I \"I always keep an my lodgings ashore, as I find tbem so convenient. I've been going about backwarde and farwards lately in the destroyer. Weil, camle and see me soan.\" H1e gave bis address and went on. RD ONALD bad na sleep that niglit. 1%The fliglit from Willowbridge bad been sa burried, and there had been sa mnucb ta do tbat lie hadl had hittIe ie for thouglit. A freeli aspect of tbe case now appalled hlm. ,Suppasing Carnwallis effected lis escape to ;-. fareign land in safety lie muet always rç-main an outlaw. JÙi- turn ta Enrrlanc. or ta any country lin wbicb tlie extradition treaty was in farce, would be highly dangerous, lie wauld be cnt off fram ail society, and wben bis title felI ta nim lie watild ilot dame to dlaim either that or hie estates. And was Enid to share sucli an existence? Had there ever been froni firet ta laet a more niad 1cbeme than their escape? Far better If le had served bis term and, If sble were SURl of tlie sanie mind, bave inarried lier on bis melease. \"Any man of coni- mon mnanlinees would have done sol\" lie exclalmed, \"mather than involve any ýone lie loved in sucli danger. H1e knew the riik she ran, until to-niglit I did not.\" Then lie plctured bis own ammest and imrnpisonment; tbe public sbanie, the cuttlng off ot ail that made lfe dear, the coarse food, the terrible garb, and lie acknowledged tbat lie felt deep fear of such a fate, ibut lie did not hesitate for a manient in hie resolve ta go on witli bis assistance; lie could flot feel that lie wae committing any crime in doing so. H1e was doing It for ber, and ta save lier lie would, If necessary, go ta the scaffold iteel!. But as boum after bour wore on tbe fate tbat tlimeatened hem appeared even more dreadful. As soon as It was morning he wmote lier an fim- paseioned appeal not ta marry Corn- wallis, pointing ont liow liencefortb she wonld be an outcast, and prom- lsing, If hle gave up tlie Idlea, ta be- fmlend bdm lover, to the end of bis life, with money, wlth advice, wltli per- tonal assistance, and of course in any case lie would go ta Spain wltli hlm. H1e sent the letter by a boy, and traited-for anl answer. This came at once, and consisted of a Une only: \"I1 thanli yen, but I arn golng ta narry binm this evenlng; I bave fully ~ounted the coet.\" On recelpt of titis letter lie went ta 1 Eornwallls. \"Do you knew what I sbould do if I vere lu your place?\" lie aske4. \"Yen would probably do the same se I arn dolng.\" \"I sbould net,\" eald Ronald sternly; t 'I slieuld go at once ta the police and c ilve mysoîf np. I would not snbject1 girl I loved ta a ]Ifs a! shame aud Pemecy,\" and, in glowlng words, lie 1 nade a strong appeal to liim. H1e t niglit as well bave speken ta the ( ~ind. Cornwallis smiled; hie only I bonglit was, \"H1e wants mie te give u ter np that be can marry lier hlm- elf.\" Ronald had uow done bis utmost; f bore was nothing left but te lielp on bis lll-starred marriage. H1e spent a a tnsy day, qulte unaware that every movement of bis was sliadowed Cornwallis sat over the fime in nioodý solitude until Ronald meturned and an. nounced that everything was ready. \"Wben do we start?\" asked Corn- wallie listlessly, as if the news barely cOncerned him. \"In baîf an houm's tume. It wîil be dark. I would mather have waited until it wae quite dark, but this was flot possible. Mise Imedale will join ns an board at Millbay, and the clergy- man will be theme aiea ta marry you -before the vessel starte.\" In haîf an liour's tume a cab came round, and Cornwallis, mnffied in a great coat, caniforter and cap, left the liotel witb Ronald. As the cab drove off Sanie one looked full in Corn- wallis's face, but lie did nat recognize hlm. But the ex-convict shooli like a leaf, and exclaimed, \"My God!\" \"'What is it?\" asked Ronald. 'That man was a wamder frai Princetown.\" \"Drive as bard as yau can go,\" said Ronald ta the cabman, and tliey went throngh the crawded streets at a mapid pace. 1Tbey got on board quickly, steani was already np, and as soon as the ceremony sbonld be pemformed the Yacht would get nnder welgli; the clergyman was already on board. Then Enid appeamed, lier face as wliite as ber lover's. \"Mm. Westlake,\" she exclalmed, turnlng instinctively ta hlm rather than Cornwallis, \"that warder I saw before bas just got ont of a cab. I paseed hlm at the gates. Wbat le ta bce done?\" \"There la only ans course open,\" sald Ronald, wlia lad been thluklng on the matter duming their drive. \"Yon and the clergyman must leave the yacht instantly, the marriage muet be deferred until you can join Corn- Wallis ýabraad, and we muet start at H1e took ont sane mauey. \"Take this and ga back ta your lodgings. Stay there until you hear from me.\" Ile left ber ta give tlie neceesary orders. Slie kieeed Cornwahls, wlio eat like one dazed by a lieavy shocli, and laud- ed, accompanied by the clergyman. The yacht lert the dock as quickly as possible. But as they passed the breakwater it came upan Rontald wlth a flash that lie wae the source of dan- ger, that lie hll beau folbowed and watched, while bad Cornwallfs been alone lie mîglit have sscaped easlly in bis présent dIeguise. What wae te be done now? CHÂPTER XIX Search. T HE yacht was a very faut one. It was uaw midnlght and she -was well ou ber way, wlien a SURi fauter steam tug overlianled lier and de- lnanded that elie eliauld, stop., Ronald abeyed Instantly; a boat was lowered from the tug, and twa men boarded the yacht. \"«You bave an escaped convlct, on board,\" they sald, and demandod that ie 4should be given up. \"I bave fia convlct on board,\" said Eonald. \"This la my hlred yacht. muers is fia ane an board except the nastorand the crsw.\" Tlie men lauglied derislvely. They îad not the sllgbtest doubt that Cernl- galles was dlsgulsed as one of the sea- nien, and signlfiod as inucli. \"Cai, tliem up and examine them me by one In the cabin,\" sald Ronald. He spake a few womds to the mas- er, wbo snmmoned the nien one by ne after lie hadl himeel! been exani- neci. Tliey dld nat waste mmcli tume an lim, bis very strongly marked fea- ures preclnded the ides, o! bis belng ornwalls, tbougb they pulled at his lacli beard to make sure It was gen- Ille. But each man's face and bande ver scrutinizsd tlioronghby, bis haîr Lertined te lie bis own, bIS figure \"Hlave we seen every man?\" thoy sked. \"Every one. Now examine the ship6.\" h e AEER Ladies' Sports ,Coats For active outdoar life nathlng equale In attractiveness and comt- fort Jaeger Sports Çoats, either In canielhair or white and fashlon- able colors. These, *wlth Jaeger Spencers, Cardigans, Golf 'rs and Sweaters, offer a choice of gar- nients for outdoor wear unisur- passed In attractiveness. A fully Illttstrated catalogue and Dr. Jaeger's Health Culture wll be sent free on application to DR. JUEGER SiryWteu CO. Liiuited MONTREAL TORONTO WINNIPEG Incorporated in England In 1883, with British Capital for the British Empire. Assimilative Memory; How to, Attend mnd Neyer F«Ige BY Prof, A. Lalsotte. The. comlese Loisotte Mernory Systeni. Its alm la ta luraethe power of mnemoty Ini much te sane proportion as the pawer of the oye for vision is lncmeased by mneane af the microscope and telescopo. l2mo, cloth, 170 pp. Price $3.00 post-Pald. \"I have no lesitation in conimending Pr ofessor Loisette's systeni to aIl who are lu earnest in wishlng ta train thefr niemories effetlvely.\"-icbard A. Pmoc- ter, the Emnent Astrouamner. UNIVERSITY BO0K CO. 8 University Av.. îToronto ires the weII gro me woma topes s W wilsdaoplexion hc )e 0eav s fo 5c o oe ~~~costesth omlian wrapin 44 St Pn tre.M t re a 1-",
         "THE COUIER. Li.*ve the Old Flagr Net merely the flag that \u003c'braved a tliousand years the battie and the breeze \"; but 'the fiag that stands for liberty te every man, for freedom of the home, for the Joy of democratie living. A FLAG FOR EVERY HOME. Living under the British or the Canadian fiag dees not mean merely the fiag on the T 'own Hall, the Parliament Buildings and the .Armouries. It moans the flag directly over your door. Lots of people live under the flag that is owned by somebody else. They imagine that a flag must have a flag-pole on the lawn or on the roof. But the flag for every home means a flag that eau be fiung from. any window, verandah-post or gable. Believing this, THE CANADIAN COUR1IER lias arranged te supply te its readers, suitable home flags at the moderato prices quoted below. These ftags are Made-in-Canada, and their weazing quali- ties are guaranteed by THE CANADIAN COOUIER. They are cheap enough for the most modest purse and good enough \"for the, elest home. 1MAIL ORDERS PROMPTLY FILLED. Ail orders promptly filled by -return mail. Send to-day, using, coupon. No letter neeessary if coupon is earefully filled, out. 1 This Union Jack 32x48 inches, complote wlth polo (0 feet long), hal- yard, and wlndow uocket, at $1.45, peut pald, lu a real bargain. It la designed te fly from an upstairs' wlndow. The Canadian Courier, Toronto, Canada. COUPON Send me a fiag. 1 have Indlcated wlth an X the one 1 want, and arn remittlug herewith the a.mêunt quoted above for this flag. Name ......................... SIZES AND Âddress ............................... PRICES: Union Jack, 32x48 inches ..................51 cents, Mal I Sost Paid (Canadian Enslgn, same slze, 5 cents extra.) Union Jack, 32x48 inches (same flag as above), complete with polo (6 feet long), halyard and window soket, $1.45, Mail Post Pald (Canadian Ensign, samne size, 5 cents extra.) Unien Jack, 24x36 inches .................. 25 cents, Mail Peut PaId Union Jackç, 20x28 lnches .................. 20 cents, Mail Post Paid Set of Allies' Flaga, 7 ln number, 15x20 inches, 70 cents, Mail Pest Paid Underi They did se. Evory hole and corner was ransackod, every lecker turned eut. Then they looked at one an- othor, theroughly mystîfiod. \"As I hope you have proved te your ewn satisfaction that I am net har- bouring a cenvict, I will thank you te beave my yacht,\" said Ronald, haught- ily. \"You have airoady deiayed me a moat uncenscionable tirne. I teld yeu at flrst that there was ne convict on board.\" \"Where la he, then?\" asked the warder. \"Where is wbo? Leave my yacht at once, and search anyone else's yeu may meet.\" This gave the men a new ide; was it possible that they had mistaken the yacht in the darkness? Thoy couid net swear te Ronald himsolf, for he had put on a reugb pilot coat and leg- gings, borrowed from the master, and looked very unlike himself in a sbabby rod cap lent by one of the men. They murrnurod an apology and withdrew frorn Ronald's yacht, but tbey cruisod about ail night, and thon returned te Plymnouth, tboroughly off their scent. Tboy telographod te ports in ail direc- tions, but the only resuit of these mes- sages was an answer, sent after soe days, that a yacht answoring the de- scription ef Renald's had arrivedl at one et the soutbern ports of France, that one gentleman only had landod, and that the yacht, after being ther- oughly ovorhauled by the police, hadl departed with ne one on board save the master and crew. Meantîme Enid rernained la ber ledglngs, a prey te the gravest anxiety. She did net dare te go eut lest she should be tehloed and recognized; she would net ait even near the win- dow. On loaving the yacht sho hait taken a cab, and blddon the man drive her to the nerth of Plymnouth, dlsmiss- ing hlme whon it was quite dark, and making ber way back te the rooma by a circulteus route. How hateful ail thia secrecy aeom- ed. ýShe feit like a crimlnal hersoîf, and wondered, whethe-r abe hait done, oither wisely or well lu entering loto those crooked paths. And ahe hadt net only ontered !ite them bersoît, but, far worso pain, hadt draggod Ronald into them. After several days had elapsed, aBe received a letter from him, bearing a forelga postmark. it waa moat e~au- tieusI\u003e' worded, and stated oui\u003e' that ho was travelling about by himself, that -ho was quite woil and comfort- able, and boped that she was the same, as there was notbing for her te be anxious about now. Ho would write again seon. H -E undei'stood thst Cornwallis ha escaped, buthow? Wby,ýWas \u003eRonald alone? The days went' by, each one more slowly than the tast. Thon carne a lot- ter wrltten ln French, but bearlng. the Wllowbridge postmark. Rer heart beat as she opened'it; she toit afrald to read the contents. Hl. J., It saldt, waa ln safo keeplng; hoe was nlot abroad. At prosent, lie, Ronald couid givo no particulars, neither couid ho corne and see ber this week; it was botter not, but would eshe meet hlm at soven o'cleck on Wed- neiday evoning in next week at the ontrance te the plor. She replled la the affirmative. A load of anxlety was on ber, for it was evident Cornwallis was net beyond the roach of his would-be captors. Wbere couId hoe be, and why had Ronald loft hlm alono? But she was sure of ono thlng, and that was that Ronald had acted wlth the groatoat wisdom and judgment; ber falth la hlm was unboundod. As te ber postponed marriago, this fact, alast dld not trouble lier. She acknewiedged to herseit wlth a sense et shamne that wben abe had been told ît could not take place aho had expert-' enced a sense o! rouiet. The woather was stormy and bitter- 1\u003e' cold. She sat over a blazlng ftre heur after heur, holding a book la ber lap, but soidom readiug. Her tboughts wero too harassing to allow ber te sloep at nlght, 'whlle ber appotlte haed taled entirol\u003e'. -Reail\u003e', Miss,\" the landlady remon- stratod, \"you don't eat enough ta keep a fiy alive. Why don't you go eut te try and get an appetite?\" \\ III arn not weil. I shall go out and thon perhaps my appetite wi turn,\" she replied wlth a smile a' effort at cheerfulness. The long dreary days before nesday at ]ast came to an end. was at the entrance te the pie? a appointed time, but did not see aid. A man ln groom's livery ace ber, saying: \"'Corne into the cari Miss.\" She hesitated, but he took ber witb a flrm grip which seemed Sti' ly familiar, and cornpelled ber to a broughamn standing near, Se hirnself beside ber. \"Why, Mr. Westlake!\" she exC ed with glad surprise as they drov \"Il did not know you.\" III have taken a leaf out Of friend's book, though 1 must saY net like a disguise. I thought it safer te put on theso clothes, whl bought ln passing through LO~ that is to say I ordered my tale send thern down to me. Now te how you have been. It is quite to talk, no one can overhear u$.\" She put aside bis question inl ently. c«Y OUJ muýst 'know that I ar n .1 with anxiety. Where lý race ? What bas bocO]J hlm?\" 'II will net keep you ln susr Whon you told me you had seefi warder, 1 knew of course that we ail la grave danger. I made surE the poUice twould follow us, 9 was at my wit's end te know wl do. No plan suggested. ltself t~ mmnd until we hadl passed the 1, water. Thon I suddenly ronieml having gono over the iighthousê e HoIe,' and an idea occurred to 'Dl would take hlm to the EddY lighthouse, and ask. the men tO hlm sheiter. IlHow could you have thougli such a thing?\" 'Il don't know. It was the oni\u003e' I knew it was possible the mon 1 nlot take hlm ln, butI thought 1 1 try. I told bilm of my suggestionl he at once acceded. I don't thi, la woll, fer he lta strangoly waiitl energy. 1 directed the skipper tO for the Eddystone, and whoni We near I hada amall boat bowerO( rowod hlm to tho llghthouse 11V Aftor soine difficulty I sucreede arouslng the men's- attention,- Cornwallis and I landed. I told tl gentleman was most anxlous to a few days thero., They sald It agalinat the rulos; visitera were ed la the daytime, but ,rnt at Thon I offered them money.\" \"How much?\" \".Neyer' mnd.' Thero wero tour and I offorod themf what I could afferd, \u003cwhich te them was a hafld sum.\"l .\"'Woil,' said one, a handselle, man, 'I don.'teall it no harmn to h visiter. If anyone cornes, we ~e~ hlm out of slght easy enough.' l'This was Just what I waflte added'a, fow pounds extra, a\"' hargaîn was concluded. If Corn,' had -remained lai thé yacht he infalllbly have beon takon.\" Ar detalled wbat .had occurrod on1 -What dld Horace sa\u003e' wh10in ioft hlmi?\" \"He seomod ver\u003e' much cast but I hope he wlll cheer up. 1 now te arrange for gettlng hlnO from the Eddystono, for 1 corde~ do not seo my way at ail. Of cc I left hlm very hurrlodiy, and r back to the yacht as fast as POss \"But how was it the men\"i give information?\" He smlled, and she forbore tO the question. Âfter a time he0 \"«The night was very dark; th0« not know I went to the EddY' an\u003e' of thein. 1 suppose the\u003e' tbl 1 had put Cornwallis on boer,~ other vessel. fuit they lied 110~ for volunteerlng information, the\u003e' had a reason for pleaslflg \"What surna of mono\u003e' YO0U spendlng for us!\" 'I shail probabi\u003e' be rePald day-If 1 am flot already rPl added. \"New you must tell Dl1O yourself.\" She told hlm of ber drOOTY and how she lied feared te 9 Whlle she was speaklng sh noar to hlm insensîb\u003e', and lie",
         "THE COURIER. er hand within his owu; It seern- te hlm. lie was justified lu doing lie knew it gave her streugtli. Atter this you may safely go out,\" E8aid, \"but 1 would rather yeu re- Inecl here for the present. I ouly lit te Willowbridge for a few hours See MY father and settie some bus!- ýs Iatters. Directly afterwards I Uled te town, ostensibly on bus!- s matters. I dread being question- by those detectives. At present ne libas seen me with Jackson, is lisen appeared at the miii, and Y have ne grounds for apprehend- Me.\"1 But wbat danger you are lu! How 1 tliank you ?\" ny taking care ef yourseIl\" le Put ber dowu near her lodgings, tWent back by train. - CHAPTER XX. BTerror That Walketh by Night. ONALD departed feeling more treubled every day. He ablior- red anl dissimulation and crooked 7s; lie liad always done se fromn his lest boyliood, wbule here lie was Iched on a course of deceit whicli rIlest repugnant te hlm. The feel- tllat lie had broken the law was ible te hlm; lie began te think eas a criminal. And yet lie knew lie liad acted in the first place fthe purest motives, tliat te save lie weuld undergo punlshment. altters at Wlllowbridge were net 1g Emoohly. Mr. Westlake, wlio a iman of penetration, wyas quite le13- te account for bis sois er- ' Molvements, which lie dld net 1bute to the business of tlie firm, Ougli lie accouuted for Ronald's O1lce thus te his wife. She aise felt lelY uueasy, tliere seemed some- g wreug lu the wliele atmospliere, !101uise appeured ia a state of sup- .Sed excitement and spoke but ý. She spent most cf lier time in derlug by the river, and as tlie ty tYPist had not reappeared, sbe e at lengtb te the conclusion that Own action had precipitated mat- *and that Ronald liad taken thie away from lier previeus lever. Wlsli Louise weuld go,\" Mrs. tiake said more than once te lier 'and; \"she makes me feel as If I Sliving near a voecano whlcb ~It break eut at any moment, and servants say lier temper ls un- able.,, It Leuise had ne Intention cf esautimle Cornwallis was farlng Y. Th'le weatlier was bitterly cold 8termny. Seas of enormeus vol- ,broke riglit ever the lighthouse. l'IniatIon witli land was sus- Led. le had taken celd lu land- nrt tlie boat, and lie was new Ill. Re managed te dress hlm- an Bat sliivering ever the small SUflutterably wretched. The men 1'erY kind, they gave hlm the fOOd tliey had, and, finding lie Seat nething selld, prepared hlm a, and seup, and theuglit te ýcheer Wl,'th yarns ef their previous ex- !ruces. tell You what It is, sir,\" said one en,\"yeni lad better go home as athe weatlier clears. This isn't Place for Yeu now.\"1 1 wretclied man groaned lnwai:diy. elle? Where was fit? Was there Place on the face cf tlie eartli for 'ed utcast? He ground ls anId thought that tlie waya cf '1ere liard. What had lie done? led wrltten anetheïr man's name, he had ýsuffered ïar more than 5,1 ln consequence. Hie was net elut, and dlId net pretend te be t'O himsef. e'a strange experlence Ïbefeil 'lspast lfe began te rise before ,At frst it was as a faint alia- amd then the recollectIons gmiw grew, and gathered ovei- hlm as [1, eliveloplng hlm ln Its thlck ýlosuntl lie feît lie ceuld have ed aloud, lie could not get frc11i It, It pursued him, It ban- lfor ever behlnd It new there th Pîcture osf the grave, and lie- tllfit the judgment to ceme. la had lis 1f. 'beeri? He recalled If ItbeIonged to someone e18e. a if some spir~it either cet goed lad talven pessession cf hlm and cempelled hlm, for the first trne since lie had been beru, to examine it. He had lived at a public school, as those bocys de live whe have ne re- strainlng home influence, and then lie had eutered into the world of fasliiofl. His career lad been that of racinig, gambling, sport, women. No single good action could lie recali-or rather his dominant spirit for hlm. \"What have you doue for others?\" said a liarsli volce in lis ear; \"eaui yeu remember ene act of self-sacri- fice, one ef evil re*sisted which miglit blet out sýome ot your offences?\" Alas! there was net eue. He was ne athelst Iu tlie sense that some of the purest and 'best people have been athlsts, uamely, i'onging te find Ged but doulbting whether He existed, theugli atter long years, of trouble they at lasýt have feund Hlm, but lie had Ibeen an atbeist lu the sense that lie d:id net like te retalu God lu lis knowledge, and God had given hîm up te the lust ef lis heart. Aud now lie satw as lie had neyer seen before that his thouglits had ail been grovelllug, mean -and, 10w, that lie lad neyer wlslied for anythlng higlier. He did net wlsh for it new, lie did net kuow, or even dimly ceinprellend, wnat things higli and holy meant, but lie treibed because lie did believe, lu the judgmeut te coule. For In this lonely liglithouse, wltli the waves roaring aro-uud, It was borne Iu upon lm that lie must die, and that shortly. The Pale Messeuger lad 'beckoned sllently, and lie knew that lie must go. He liad neyer thouglit et deaili before except as a re- mote centingeucy far, far off, but uew every day 1brought It nearer. What weuld future lite mean te hlm? 'Supposing Iby somne miracle tlie gates of Heaven were opeued te hlm would lie be happy? He would uet. What place lad another world for bMs pleasures: 'was there, a single higli eue among tliem? The best feeling ef bis life bad been bis love for Enld, and lie turued te lier as a tewer of strengtl. He desired bier presence as lie had neyer des-ired It before: e mnust corne, she mnust save hlm frem himself. 'One might there, came a terrible sterm, the very foundations of the lighthouse ,seemed to shake as the water dasled over it, the wind raged and slirleked. Cornwalls lay lu ls uarrow bunli and sbtvered w1tli tear, 1115 nerves liad departed su-tee lis lluess, lie was a prey te terrer botli mental and phy- s1cal. T IE next morniug, the meu found him delirious aund lu a higli fever; lie repeated perpetualiy, \"Enid, Enid, Euld; 1 -waut lier; alie Must corne.\", STliey tended him te the best cf their albility, but atter au hour or two liad elapsed the oldest man, eue Bell, said, \"That poor cliap will drive me frantic sean witli lis. callings for Euid. He can't stay here, mates.\"- lit was decided te write te Ronald, who had lef t an address that would readli hlm, and say that as soon as the 'weather moderated the gentleman muet lie rerneved, they could net have hlm die on their hajids w1heut even hav4:ng seeu a docter. Thls letter was despatdhed as accu as the -fIrst craft whlch passed ou 1er way te Plymouthi oould take, it. By thia time Cornwallis was better and could ait up. HRe aise wrete a latter te Euld whidh b. enclosed te Ronald. She must come to hlm, lie sald, she musi marry hlm, at onceý le could ne longer be left alone wherever lie unIgnt lie,, by day or nIlght. As lie sent the leiter open, Ronald thouglit It wasin tended for hlm te read. The appalling selflshuesa ef 1h over- came hlm. To cali sucli a feeling love was, lie considered, a desecratiou. This man w-lshed a pure, beautiful glrl te lluk h«rself te a dylug bnnted oni- vict. He was a strong man hlmself, and lie dld net realize, lie could not reallze the deptli of agony and fear tlirugh whidh Coruwglls had gono- uxntil ut length feeling lad woru lt- self eut ln Illluess-and lie heartily de-. splsed h4m. But noue the less It was lis duty te send the letter te EnId, This sign on Ser- vice Stations throughout Can- ada and the United States guarantees expert care for your Hupmobiie when and where you want It-wlthout Cost to you. The Squarest Deal for You and Your Hupmobile At last, a tangible\u003e national service plan whicla inures againat motor car troubles In line with our policy of preducing To give ei the best car of its class lu the werld, have es we now announce what we believe vice stal te be the flrst and best plan of the Uni national servlce-to-the-owner yet Itere is se devised. and se This plan is se simple, and se cern- afford t piete, that its basic principles are first lear almest certain to be iusisted upofl The 1916 by ail car ewners as a standard of automoli what metor car service sheuld be. ever bui lIs distinctive feature is a book of 100 antee of coupons which every buyer receives the Hup with a 1916 Hupmiobile, and whldh offe-. we can be cashed at any Hupmoblie tienal ca service station ln Canada or the We urge y United States' dealer g These coupons entitle the .onr te 50 Or write u heurs of free laber-sufficient, under the plan erdinary clrcumnstances, te keep the cataleg car in perfect runnlng condition. Hupmob And this service la over and above the. regular guarantee agalnst de- Hupp fective parts and materiais. It ls paid for eut 0f a fund established De jelntly by the Hupp Moter Car Comn- pany, Its distributers, dealers and sales representatives. As each car ls shipped, a definite amount of meuey ls set aside for free service on thait particular car. This service ls for yeux car only; the labor cainut le performed on an- ether Hupmebule. The new plan provides for the regu- lar Care, inspection and adjustment witheut which ne automobile can remain at lIs best. MADiE IN CANADA 1916 Hupmobile Prices Prices f. o. b. Windsor as foliows: FIve-passenger Touring Car, $1,385; Roadater, 138;Sedan, $1,820; Limousine, $3,185; AiI-year Touring Car, $1,525; Aii-year Coupe, $1,500; Seven-passenger Touring 'Car, $1,635. rx system national scepe, we talished hundreds of ser- tiens threugheut Canada and ted States. a-vice se tangible, se definite practical, that yeu canuet 3 purchase any car witheut ning ail its details. I-upmobile Is the greatest le value 1h15 company has IL. When we add the guar- satisfaction resulting fremn mobile service system, we -feel sure, the most excep- .r value lu the world. 'ou te have your Hupmnolule ive you the full particulars. is. and we will tell you how wokand send yen the ofthe savon leautiful new îles. Motor Car Company sk A, Windsor, Ont. This leather bound cou- pon bock ls given yeu when You purchase a 1916 Hupmebile. The coupons are ex- changeable fer 50 heurs of free service labor on your Hupmnoblle at any Hupmobile Service Sta-_ tien lu Canada or the United States. s SHOPPER'S GUIDE PRINTING. PRIE TICKETS that seil the goods. Ail prices ln stock. Flfty cents per hundred. Samples for stamp. Frank H. Barnard, 35 Dundas St., Toronto. STAMPS AND COINS. PACKAGE free to collectera for 2 cents Postage; aise offer hundred différent foreiga stamýps; catalogue; hinges; five cents. We buy stanips. Marks Staimp Ce., Toronto. BOOKS. ASSUILAIVEMIMORY, OR HOW 'ý TO TTEND N EVER POR- GET. Prof A Lacisette telle how yeu m Iay strèeng~en'the power of your mem- orY. A perfect meanory uleans Iacroased capalblittes and a larger Incomne. i2mo.. cloth, $3,00, poat-pald. UnIver1iy Book Co., Desk A., 8 University Ave.. Toronto. HOTEL DIRECTORY THE NEW FREEMAN'S HOTEL. (European Plan) One Hundred and Flfty Rooma. Single moins, without bath, $1.50 and $2.00 per day; roonis wlth bath, $2.00 per day and upwards. St.'James and Notre Dame Ste., Montreal. KING EOWARD MOTEL. Toronito, Canada. -Fireproof- Accommodation for 750 ruests, $1.50 Up. American and European Plans. MOSSOP MOTEL. \u003cLlmited) TORONTO, ONTARIO. Eurepean Plan. Absolutely Fireproof. Rooms wlth or wlthout bath froxn $1.50. Talk Correct\"y and You Wi I hink Correctly Slipsliod Engliah promotes AIlpshod thought Get iuto the habit of careless use et words and you, will seon be careless lu thouglit. To thlnk correotly and talk correcti?, te talk cerrectly and think cor- gectly you will ~Ud A DESK BOOK 0F ERRORS IN ENGLISH a very serviceable littie book. \"Riglit te the point.\" 12mo., eloth, 24 pages, $.pp University Book Comipany SucCoeum te Norman 1RJhardsen. 8 Unlvewilty Avenue oet",
         "THE COURIER. mst be used fora perfectly Perfect Teasaimucor infusion. 1k' 'I Tea is the acme pf perfection, being ail pure, delicieus tea. Black. Mixed or Green. inprove Incirease r our Your inglish Income These Great Books point the way .for you to Advancement-Success -ProsperityI in Commercial and Professional Life Wt the mghty adysaces vhich are belng made lu every bruaich of butinons and profeaonal lite thora hau ceame a demand for a lilgher standard of inteUlgence-oft prolltncy. The time lu paut when lfllloracy or sUlpohod methodu of speech and cor- respondance are Ieoked upon vilh tolerance. The man who u express hlmseU with force and clearneu tu the man vho la in demand, oeywhere. GET THESE SIX VITAL BOOKS Aside trois 111,r great value ln videning a m«a' mental pmrpetlv\"-utting hlm la a position te approciate and enjW aIl the beautles of literature-t-hese six books have an intrlnuic value far beyond thoir cest. They haveý put thouanda of mon and vomen int the, petit that lea te incroaned buainess, promotion, and higher eaiary. They are th1e alxuplout the mont practîcal, the beut, for Business Managers, Corre- spondenta, Advertisemoent Writors, 13tenographere, ýStory Writeru, Authora, Public Speakers, and othors. 1'Your course ls rîeh aud fie. Yeu uetrm to have condensd 1h. expert- ence, of yoars int a fsv uentences that a buainess man can use Immodiately,\" maya W. P. Warren, Marshall iel \u002611 CIo.'u Advertlulng Manager, in apeaklng of thug. books. WORTH TREIR WEIBNT 1U COLI, BUT THEIRE THIRS FOR A TRIFLE These six books tIndi Many7 chapterg covsrlng auoh subjeatu au apenliai U. 0f word@ Verse Writing Prnuctaticu style ne4 Diction Novel Writing Wori.-Buildtng »sacripllou uà oraummar Dialogue BotIWýLwte PAU i capitaiszation, Advertuement Wrttfng zev te Studr hkuer Punotuaticu ]Kow te Write a Story and Other GrAuthers latter Writing-AII Mlade Ob.aracte Study Thoe books aloo ahow you the correct uae of Engliah lu Short Stoien,, liovela, Egss, Articles, COonversation, Speeches, Bui. usas5 and Privat, Oorrespondence, Advertsnenotu, circuler$, UNIVERSITY Beoklets, e. BOOK CO.. 8.Univeuaity Ave Formerly Cost $25--Now Oidy $3--$1.00 Down, Toronto 50 Cents a Moulli Inclosei fini $1.00 for vhlch sond me Shervin In typewnitten form t1hi courge of utudy, ou ,c odyla @lx cloth-b*ound books, novw publluhed lu those six clotli-bound books, -The Art of Speaking andi vas sold for $25.00. Thens are over 800 Wrlllug the Englith Lansuage.\" I iii gend you four funther panes malteAc ac a . Mouthly peymeuts 0f 50 cents each. with $1.00, end th1e \u0026et of boeoks yjfl uil the pnice w.300) la pau. be forwven4ed te you, canniage prepai; 50 cents a month for four menthe ............... Pays fer them. This lu the, big- ot056.............. gaest 3.00 vorth of books yeunPe~~............. eyer beaight. province............................ Ul4IVERS11y BOOK CO\u003e., 0 ~Date........... .......................... and hear what sýhe had to -say. She was stili living the most sol!- tary ef lives, and every s:ense had be- corne quickened; she saw iin the few lunes what iRonald -could flot ses, that lier lover's need for lier was very great, and aithougli love as love had died in her heart, the love of a di- vine -compassion was still there. She ddd flot hesitate a moment; she would accede to his wish and tend hlm by niglit and day until he died. She wrote to Ronald to that eff ect, and lie sorely againsýt bis will, was con- strained to tink ont sorne plan for carrying lier 'wishes toto offect. He deternined to go down to Ply- mouth, hire, a boat, and go off to the Eddystone, that he miglit judgo for hirnself of CornwallIs's -state. He salled down the coast, and, the weathea' being favourable althougli very cold, shaped a course for the Eddystone after dark. He held some conversation with the men, to wliom he made a further pre- sent, and then saw Cornwallis, who, wrapped lin rugs and blankets, was sit- ting up In a chair. By this time the men lied corne to the conclusion that there was something very ýqueer about their guest. 'During bis delirium lie had puslied as1de hi\u0026 wig, but on flrst recoverlng consclousnless liad asked for a looking glass and appeared pain- fulýly; anxious to renovate birnself. 'Ronald saw that he wa-s looking very 111, but otlierwIse coul'l perceive no partîcular change ln his appearance; once more ho wonderod wby everyone said hoe was so handsome a man, ho, Ronald, did not consider hlm haind- \u0026orno ut all He spoke to birn veýry klndly, and promisod to !bring EnId to hlm. 'Cornwallis's face brightenied. 'IBring ilier at once, and bring a clergyman. I have the license and she can marry me lioro.\" \"What?\" oxclainied 'Ronald aghast. 11Why do yuu say 'WWhat?\"' said CornwallIi poevishly. \"How olso conld she lie always wlth me when we land? I want ber always, and I can't do wltliout hor.\" \"But supposing I cannot arrange for your removal at once. ýShe cannot stay boere.\" \"I bave made up my mind to marry her,!'- sald Cornwallis angrily, \"and l know she is anxlous to rnarry me. Did she flot tell yeu she would?\" 'Ronald was constrained to admit that she had done 80., 111 know it,\" the othor retorted tri. urnplantly, \"there, neyer yet was a woman who did not love me whon 1 chcase te, make lier do so.\" The slglit of ýRonald had Ibrouglit back, temporarily, somle -of his oid galety, bis four had departed foût a tîme. iRonald choko'd down hi. dis- guet, and said that lie must now go; he would have to hear what Miss Ire- dale badl to say. \"qet hlm away soon, sir,\" said Bell, as Rtonald re-eiitored bis boat; \"lie won't Ilve long. I see lt ln bis face.\" Then nîglit doopened, and Cornwal- Is was once more a prey to terror CHAPTER XXI. A Cat's Paw. IT sometirnes happons that when we can Ses no liglit, no means of escape from our troubles, that a patb lis suddenly openod to us. Ronald feit absolutely hopeless as ho went away from the Eddystone llght- house. He thought and thouglit, but no safe moans, for resculng Cornwallis occurred to hlm. After havIng run ,uch terrible risks It seemed hard te look on ail hi, previous trouble a. thrown away. «I cannot disappolint ber,\" he sald, mentally, \"altýhough for ber own salie the best thing that could happen to her would te that Cornwallis sbould be taken.\" With every landlng stage closely watched, bow could ho got hlma ashore, and yet bow could ho louve a man so 111 wlthout aome strwig man te look aftor hlm. If he took hlm to a forelgn port his, Ronald',, preêsence would be sufficient to cause an instant arrest. ge saw no way. But on landlng ho camte across Lieu- tenant Haselfoot. \"Ilullo!\" exclaimed that young man, \"1why, where have y.ou sprung frein1 \"Wjaere bave you sprung fr01 queried Ronald, instead of answer the question. \"1? 1 have just landed fronmy MY sol. Every niglit we go cruls about.\" \"Where? Not near the EddystOfl asked Ronald, witb an anxioty lie tr bard to dlsguise. \"Why, that i. just what wo are *îng. Looking out for an Iniaglu onerny, and expecting an attack W11 ever the powers that bo choose tO 9 the orders. Why do you want know?\" \"Oh, I was wonderlng where wont,\" 'replie d Ronald, vaguely. \"I wbhere are you off to now? Corne have supper witb me sornewhere.\" \"Very sorry. Can't. Must g0 duty again in throe bours' tîmOe, I want to go to my diggings Jusiu see If there are any lettor. for 1 Wby nlot corne wlth me and httvl snack there.\" \"Witb -pleasure,\" asserted Ron1alC Haselfoot's \"diggings\" were Of most comfortable order, while the s per, hastily or-dered and served, 1 daIntily spread. \"I do enjoy a meal ashore, \" 8 Haselfoot, as ho stretcbed out his 1 luxuriously and lit a cigarette Vil bis guest had rofusod. \"I aîways fa] the food in the destroyer bas a flav of oil. And my landlady is nO o! a good soul, a regular mother me. I've lodged with hor everY ti I've been down this way.\" R ONALD was sllent for a fewr IXmonts, thinking bard. Ho 1 noticed bow dainty the sliP bad been, and was concocting a P1,9 \"Does your landlady happon te li any more rooms to lot?\" \"Wall, she is generally full UP, Juat 110w I boliovo ber drawflg-ro floor is to lot. Now 1 corne te tl' o! It ber lodgor went out yester'd Tbe rooms are nover vacant long. \"I wonder if I migbt Ses theni?» -Why, of course, you might,\" a Haselfoot, and rang the bell. It was not long before the laiidla Mrs. Carter, appearod in perso11. pleaant-faced bonest-looking w0e who spoke'wlth a Cornl.h accent. Ronald made hi. request knowfl was shown the vacant a-partn011ts sitting-room and two bed-rooMS. Tl were o! a good size and scrupu1lel dlean. Ho expresed hi. ,atifat witb thorn. \"They are just what I arn 1oo0 out for, for some friands of Mine,18 invalid gentleman and hi. wife, 1 think I rnay venture to taRe th f or a week from to-day. Sbould friends be satisfied tboy will no1d romain on. But I jnust tell yoU thé gentleman i. really 111, and require total quiet, also ,ueh cOùk as will ternpt the appetito of an!1N 0f course this will lie rernembered the terma.\" \"I arn sure I will do my best W ln' the lady and gentleman bapPY2 comfortaible, sir,\" replied Mrs. Ce~1 who was greatly taken wfth the 4 tesy of Ronald'. manner, and lighted with his liberality and feijl to request exact mention to lie 1Uý of \"extra,.\" \"Thore can't te a (Ile~ home than this. Mr. Haselfoclt 15 91 f or days together very 0f ton, anid ho is here ho dues not bave racketty parties like some YoungS tlemen. I suppose the lady anXd tlemaxp will nlot keep much coiIWl1 \"Note at ail,\" returned ROI gravely; \"1ho la not lin healthfe ciety. TIxey wll Ses11 neone, 1 i111 I canuot tell Yeu whethor th8Y corne at once, 'but pIeuse have rooms tborougbly ready.11 '«Certainly, air, and If quiet la 5e s ary for the p oor kentleman 1 will 9 on thrn myself, instead of lt Eliza go in, who ls a good girl, Sr clumay ut times.\" Ronald returned to Haslf0Qtf told hlm what he had doue. \"*Are the rooms for fiaonds of Yu \"Yes, and I want you to do me a 6 turn.11 \"With Pleaeure.\" \"The man wbo la comlng U. a valid. Hoe has set hi, heart 011b married at once to the girl te e",
         "THE COURIER. s engageoi, but in his state of h1 abeolute quiet and privacy le SsarY. Stili we want a witneee to ýeremony. WIII you corne?\", Tliy, of course I wiIl, though as \u003eoorehlap le 111 it eeems a pity flot 't Off the wedding.\" e Ie anxious to get abroad, and he Muet have her wlth hlm as hoie see. And wliere le the wedding ke place?\" 01U wlll no doiibt be eurprieed Itell you at the Eddyetone liglit- re they mad?\" aeked Haselfoot. 0, flot madder than other people,\" Bd1 Ronald, drly. \"But lie landed e Eddystone, and lias been 111 .Y'ou muet underetand the whole les muet lie kept an absolute ýt. We don't want to get the 'Ouse men into trouble for havlng )ured hlm; and tliey have been 900d to hlm; there are also famlly Iriglit; I shan't say a word. How Whndoee the weddlng take heu will you be next off the Eddy- ?Po -mnorrow night.\" Mnflorrow niglit It shaîl be. They a sPecial license and can be mar- Pelen and where they please.\" le a very strange place to be Bd wlth.\" 15. I think you have met the rlady some time ago.\"1 bat le her name?\" 'Would flot reveal anything to you. 't thin\u003c you ever lieard -it.\"1 1 meet so many girls and for- Iabout tliem afterwards.\" 8t s0,\" said Ronald, earnestly g that he had forgotten hie ntre witli Mise Iredale. He would ave sald anything about having ler to Haselfoot, liad lie not in ret Instance tliought that no one forget Enld's face If lie liad once It. And there he was riglit, for the time of meeting came, Hasel- r'ecOllected ler iiistantly. Ar- Luents as to time were then made, vWhlch the naval man announced lme wae up, and lie muet go on 'Mforrow niglit, then,\" were Ron- Mrting worde; you wlll not fail ITIo0rrow nlght-Admlraîty al- Permitting. Thougli wliy,\" he sotto voce, as he went down ad, \"wliy mny presence as a wit- lhould be so desirable, and, wliy lithouse men couldn't have beeno 'L3es de more than I know. I sup- t's because they want it to lie secret. Rum start anyliow, an 1 fin an out-of-the-way liglithouse! s no business of mine.\" CHAPTER XXII. A Lonely Bride. ýALD wrote to Enid that niglit, Iaaking an appointment witli her ) Meet hlm the next mornlng in 't road out qf Plymouthi. He 't it IlmpSsele that he couid 'le id flow, and, as a matter of fact, O ccael\u003cpj le was not. 1 £ elt sadly lowered in lier own 18 she made her way by a cfr- route to the aDPolnted rendez- 'as thîs secrecy neyer to end? Ihe always to go tlirough IMfe Oit to look anyone In the face? V'Oice wlthn, lier answered that 'recY Would not be for long. As ýked at the tlirongs of people I Lý6e5 elie wondered if auy one »pDy» If everyone did flot beneath eOuftenance bear as mueh care Was beartng. And thon the that have comforted laden souls Slast two tliousand years com- ber aiea, \"Corne unto Me, ail ye 'e weary and lieavy laden, and give you rest.\"1 There was no h19as worldly happiness, she t, but heavenly happiness was taillable. Was it Possible, she lherself, that ehe was the same 10 8,t Court balis and entertain- 'Innerable had laugbed andt throughlirle, knowing Uittîs or elerable anguleli of the achlng aP0und lier. God help them! God hellJ tliem every one!\" sie ejacu- lated fervently. It was in the bend of a quiet country lane that she perceived Ronald, who was awaiting lier anxiously. \"I had to see you,\" lie exclaimed, \",for so muci lias to be done before to- night,\" and lie told lier of hie inter- view witli Haselfoot, and what liad been arrangedi. \"Ie it to be to-niglit?\" elie aeked, and turneýd very white. \"To-niglit, if you will. It seems too good an opportunity to lie lost,\" and lie adcled a few more words than lie hadi said to Haselfoot. \"I shahl le ready at the appointed tirne. WiII Mr. Haselfoot be silent as lie does not understand the neceslty for silence ?\" \"He will be silent.\" There was a long pause. \"Enid,\" said Ronald, speakIng in tones of intense emotion, and using thie narne for the first time, \"are you sure that you will go tlirougli with thie? There le tîme even now to draw back.\" B UT elie came of a race that would neyer draw back and would die -game; the liarder tlie task the more resolute would slie lie to fulfil IL. \"I will go tlirough witli it,\" she re- plied, firmly. \"May God 'be with you,\" lie eaid, earnestly, and, after a few more words, left lier. She returned to lier roome feeling thoroughly exhausted She liad not one idea of joy or liapplnees in wliat was to 'befaîl lier, nothlng but prof ound compassion for Cornwallis In lier lieart. She tlirew liereelf on lier linees and prayed for guidance. She would suli- due lier love for Ronald if posslble. In marrying Cornwallis she would lie sacriflcing lier own -wlslies and de- vices; was not self sacrifice always riglit? \"He neede me,\" sie thouglit; \"Ron- aldi le etrong and dos not need me.\" She remembered when she was first engagedi to Cornwallis liow eagerly se liad looked forward to beliig married. Firet there would be the loy of belng with hlm, then the deliglit of weddlng presents, a superb trousseau, aIl tliosA thînge whicli are dear to the lieart of a girl. Wliat baad elie now? Wliat would lier mother think If elie could only know? \"Do wishee attalned, always turn ta bItternees and sorrow?\" ehe asked lier- self. \"I ws.nted to marry Horace be- fore anythlng else ln life, and now I arn going to marry hlm, and 1 am iniserable.\"1 But she felt asliamed of liersef and lier weakneee, besides there was mucli to be done, she resolved not to give way again. ,She lnformed lier landlady that ehe wae going away that evening, unex- pectedly. \"So soon, Miss?\" aeked the woman, with suspicion. \"I have to go to a sick friend,\" she replled, hating lierself for these eva- ,;Ions, whicli, thougli the trutli, were not the whole trutli. Then sie began to wonder wliat she would wear. What bride's circuni- stances could be more mournful? Was not black. the fittlng garli? It was:, she toit she could not put on a coloured drees. So, instead of bing surrounded with admlring relations and brides- maids, instead of putting on costly array, site prepared herseîf alune. She wore lier one black dress, b\u003eut she Put on a frchu of filmy beaut!uI lace, a remnant of former finery, and, knowlng Cornwallis's eys for detail, placed a few white flowers in ber bosom. (To be eontlnued.) Wlse Plttaburg.-Plttsburg chose a minstrel show In preference to W. J. Bryau \u0026q an attraction at a charitable entertainnient. We have to admit thst Pltteurg, le fast regalnlng a rerputation for good sense. lt Seemna S' ..--To Precldent Wood- row Wlson, llfe la just one note after another. I*'ky Hot a trip \"JFa.rDowni East\" to Mie F amous Atlantic Resorts Whlcli stretch froni Boston north ta New Brunswick and Nova Scotia? This strip of coast le dotted wlth places of historic and llterary Intereet. The scenery le varled and dellghtful tliroughout, and every klnd of suminer recreation le afforded. Comfortable liatels and boarding bouses are avallable, w1tli a range of prices to suit every purse. OId Orchard Kennebunkport St. Andrews [Maine]I [Maine] [New Brunsw.ick] and a liundred seaside resorts'in Nova Scotia [Evang.ti.,e Land] are waitlng for you. .Travel thereby the Canadian Pacifie Railway Full particulars from any Canadian Pacile Ticket Agent, or write M. G. Murphy, District Paseenger Agent, Toronto. ëR Take Your Vacation at Muskoka' Lakes x§1 \\ -Corne to this region of con- MUS genial summer hotels and cottages, excellent camping spots, s pl1e nd id fishing, - picturesque canoe routes_ winding streamns and many delightful islands. Make yorsummer home in this ideal resort district. Beauti- fui small islands and choice locations for sale. TAKE T H E CÂNADIAN NORTHERN RY. to the fin- est recreation districts in Can- ada, including: Lake St. John District, Muskoka La k es, Rideau Lakes, Lake Edward, Que., Georgian Bay and Parry Sound as well as rnany others. WRITE TO-DAY FOR THESE BOOKS-\"Where to Fish and Hunt\", MHotel Lake St, Joseph, Quebec\", \"Mus- koka's Lake Shore Line\", \"Sumrner Resorts Along the Road by the Sea\", '\"Outdoors in Canada\", 'Enjoy a real recreation and'rest for tired nerves in the pic- turesque lakes, -streams and wooded isies of Muskoka Lake\u0026 District. For further particulars as to rates and service apply to nearest C.N.R. Agent, or General Passenger Department, 68 King Street East, m1 [h Toronto, Ont. OUR ADVERTISING POICY We wil not, knowingl1 or intentionally, insërt advertisements from other than perfectly reliable firnis or businiess men. If suh- scrihers find an y of thexu to be- otherise, wç will esteemi it a favour if they will so adylse us, giving fulil particulars. Advertising Manager Canadien Courier",
         "It's the \"EXTRA\" that you get which makes it- Worth while to \"Say \"Dominion\"-and stick to it\"l Extra higli-grade up-river Para Rubber-extra quality flawless Sea Island Cotton-extra experience gained in making the type of tires which are the biggest sellers ili America-extra rubber that goes into the \"nobs\" of \"Nobby Treads,\" making them 90 per cent. less liable to puncture than ordinary tires- -these make \"DOMINION\" Tires sucli \"'extra\" value that motorists who use thema once insist on them there- alter. Such tires cost money in the making, and the extra value -is yours. Ilenember that,iîf a dealer tries to switeh you off the extra value \"'DOMINION\" to another tire more profitable to hi. \" 4Say -\"POMIIOeN\"-and stick to it. \" If you have any trouble getting what you want, write our nearest Brandi or our Home Office ini Montreal and we will sc that you are promptly supplied. .Canadian Consolidated Rubber Company, Limited 28 Branches in Canada, including WINNIPEG, REGINA, SASKATOON, CALGARY and EDMONTON Montreal Nobby Tread Rest for ail-round service, ail the time, everywhere. Gripa the alipperiest pavements - #aves 90 per cent of punctures. Chain, Tread An effective anti-akid tire at a moderate price-tàe beat for the money. Plain Tread The basis of all \"Dominion\" Tires - the masterpiece of tire making akill. 1.~.*~* (I ,-,.e 72W 'JJ"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Courier Press, Limited, [1915]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Biweekly Feb. 2, 1918-Oct. 15, 1920"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian courier. : Vol. XVIII. No. 11 (August 14th, 1915)"
      ]
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06911_455/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "France : British Expeditionary Force, [1917]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "1 electronic text.",
         "Irregular."
      ],
